Massachusetts, session 194th, S2542.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for a program of climate change adaptation, resiliency and the
2 preservation and improvement of environmental and recreation assets of the commonwealth,
3 sections 2 to 2G inclusive, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this
4 act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds.
5 These sums shall be in addition to any amounts previously authorized and made available for the
6 purposes of those items. The sums set forth in sections 2 to 2G, inclusive, shall be made
7 available until June 30, 2032.
8 SECTION 2.
1 of 96

9 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS
10 Department of Conservation and Recreation
11 2840- 7028 For the study, planning, permitting, design, construction, reconstruction,
12 repair, removal, demolition, improvement, furnishing, equipping or rehabilitation of department
13 of conservation and recreation properties, including, but not limited to, reservations, facilities,
14 infrastructure, forests, parks, campgrounds, comfort stations, harbor islands, skating rinks, skate
15 parks, swimming and wading pools, spray parks, golf courses, tennis courts, basketball courts,
16 ball fields, playgrounds, exercise and fitness paths, tracks, other recreational facilities, historic
17 sites, beaches and storage buildings, office buildings, visitor centers, fire towers, maintenance
18 facilities and other park buildings structures, and equipment, including upgrades to information
19 technology equipment to be considered in consultation with the secretary of technology services
20 and security, and for the planning, design, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair,
21 removal, improvement or rehabilitation of bike paths, greenways, accessible trails, recreational
22 trails and equipment; provided, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may
23 provide guidance for planning, prioritizing, selecting and implementing capital projects in
24 furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation and consistent with state
25 hazard mitigation and climate change adaptation plan and may support disadvantaged
26 populations; provided further, that funds may be expended to support municipal equipment needs
27 for combating wild and forest fires; provided further, that the department of conservation and
28 recreation may expend funds for technical assistance and grants to public and nonpublic entities
29 in accordance with rules or regulations adopted by the department to implement this item;
30 provided further, that in expending funds under this item, the commissioner shall prioritize
31 public health and safety and capital to maintain public assets….$587,375,000
2 of 96

32 2890-7036 For the study, planning, permitting, design, engineering, construction,
33 reconstruction, repair, improvement or rehabilitation of department of conservation and
34 recreation roadway, bridge and path of travel related infrastructure including, but not limited to,
35 parkways, boulevards, multi-use trails, internal state park roads, transportation infrastructure,
36 recreational trails, pedestrian bridges and related appurtenances and equipment; provided, that
37 funds may be expended for pedestrian and bicycle safety, traffic calming, landscape
38 improvements, street lighting, safety equipment and accessibility; provided further, that all work
39 funded by this item shall be carried out according to standards developed by the department
40 pursuant to historic parkways preservation treatment guidelines to protect the scenic and historic
41 integrity of the bridges and parkways under its control; provided further, that the secretary of
42 energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, selection
43 and implementation of projects in furtherance of state hazard mitigation and climate change
44 adaptation plan and may support disadvantaged populations….$176,670,000
45 2800-7026 For the design, construction, maintenance, repair, removal and improvements
46 of state-owned or abandoned dams identified by the office of dam safety, including
47 improvements to the aquatic habitat, and inland flood control projects and projects for related
48 facilities and equipment; and for the design, construction, maintenance, repair or improvement of
49 the department’s coastal and marine infrastructure and coastal ecological resources including, but
50 not limited to, shore protection, docks, piers, culverts, beaches, dunes and salt marshes; and for
51 the navigational and ecological performance of the Commonwealth’s tidal and nontidal
52 waterways, provided that the department of conservation and recreation shall give priority to
53 dams and flood control projects that pose the greatest risk to public health or safety, or to the
54 environment; provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may
3 of 96

55 provide guidance for planning, prioritizing, selecting and implementing projects in furtherance of
56 the goals of the state hazard mitigation and climate change adaptation plan….$308,100,000
57 2800-1123 For the acquisition of land and interests in land by the department of
58 conservation and recreation and for associated costs, including planning, study, due diligence,
59 title and appraisal services, site restoration and stewardship, including, but not limited to, coastal
60 land acquisition and securing access to protected coastal lands, and lands to provide for the
61 inland movement of coastal habitats; provided, that funds may be used for capital investments
62 related to the stewardship of such land; and provided further, that funds may be used for
63 restoration and reclamation of acquired land, including demolition of structures, removal of
64 debris, eradication of non-native species and other services essential to these reclamation
65 efforts….$40,000,000
66 2800-7024 For a forestry and tree planting program for projects throughout the
67 commonwealth including, but not limited to, the evaluation and planning of forestry and tree
68 planting projects, and tree stock, planting and associated costs; provided, that the secretary of
69 energy and environmental affairs shall give priority to the planting of trees in areas experiencing
70 heat island effects, that are underserved with tree cover, with disadvantaged populations, that are
71 affected by severe weather events or insect infestation, where aquifers, recharge areas, wells,
72 reservoirs and other water bodies are located that will improve and protect water quality as part
73 of a natural ecosystem and in furtherance of climate change mitigation, adaptation and resiliency
74 strategies; provided, that the secretary may provide guidance for coordination between municipal
75 and utility stakeholders on incorporating utility gas leaks data into planning for street tree
76 planting projects and for testing street tree pits for methane before planting; and provided further,
77 that funds from this item may be expended to provide grants, technical assistance, or other
4 of 96

78 support to landowners to undertake capital projects, including, but not limited to sustainable
79 forest management and long term conservation practices, to protect the ecological integrity of the
80 commonwealth’s forestlands under the Forests as Climate Solutions plan….$20,000,000
81 SECTION 2A.
82 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS
83 Department of Environmental Protection
84 2200-7026 For the assessment, containment, monitoring, cleanup, control, public
85 participation, removal of or response actions concerning oil or hazardous materials or for any
86 other action necessary to implement chapter 21E of the General Laws and the Massachusetts
87 Contingency Plan….$42,000,000
88 2200-7027 For capital investments in air, water and land resource protection, climate
89 adaptation and decarbonization and ensuring access to clean water and air including, but not
90 limited to, energy, climate and environmental projects and programs to optimize and preserve
91 environmental quality and public health and to provide for appropriate protection, restoration,
92 management and best use of air, water and land resources, assets and infrastructure, including
93 but not limited upgrades to laboratory equipment, projects related to nonpoint and point sources
94 of water pollution and the wetlands circuit rider program; provided, that funds may be used to
95 provide grants to public and nonpublic entities and tribal governments for protection and
96 restoration of the commonwealth’s environmental resources to invest in efficient and effective
97 mitigation projects and initiatives to restore and preserve the commonwealth’s air, climate,
98 energy, water and land resources, assets and infrastructure; provided, that the secretary of energy
99 and environmental affairs may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, selection and
5 of 96

100 implementation of projects in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation, resiliency
101 and adaptation….$27,800,000
102 2200-7028 For assessment, containment, monitoring, cleanup and closure of existing or
103 closed solid waste facilities causing or threatening to cause pollution as authorized by section 4
104 of chapter 21H of the General Laws, and for capital expenditures associated with composting,
105 recycling and waste reduction programs consistent with the comprehensive statewide solid waste
106 master plan authorized by section 21 of chapter 16 of the General Laws….$28,100,000
107 2200-7029 For investments in clean water and drinking water infrastructure by the
108 department of environmental protection to address per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance (PFAS)
109 contamination of public water supplies, private wells, or imminent hazard conditions pursuant to
110 section 3A of chapter 21E of the General Laws, including, but not limited to, planning,
111 construction, replacement, repair, or modernization of infrastructure that enhances ground and
112 surface water resources, ensures the safety of drinking water, or protects public health; provided,
113 that this item may be used for response actions that create a capital asset or result in
114 improvements to capital assets including but not limited to installing filters or other treatment
115 systems, excavation, covering and fencing contaminated soil and associated planning and
116 design….$120,000,000
117 SECTION 2B.
118 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS
119 Department of Fish and Game
6 of 96

120 2300-0422 For the acquisition of land and interests in land by the department of fish and
121 game and for associated costs, including but not limited to, planning, studies, due diligence, title
122 and appraisal services, site restoration and stewardship; provided, that such lands may be
123 purchased after approval by the commissioner of fish and game; provided further, that funds may
124 be expended on the development and implementation of a capital stewardship program on lands
125 under the care and control of the department of fish and game and its divisions; provided further,
126 that funds may be used for restoration, repair and reclamation of acquired land, including, but not
127 limited to, demolition of structures, removal of debris, eradication of nonnative species and other
128 capital investments essential to these reclamation efforts; provided further, that projects may be
129 carried out with other public and nonpublic entities, including, but not limited to, federal and
130 state agencies, municipalities, nonprofit and conservation organizations, public and private land
131 owners and tribal governments….$53,500,000
132 2300-7019 For planning, design, engineering, construction, reconstruction, renovation,
133 repair, demolition, acquisition, enhancements, improvements, removal and replacement of the
134 infrastructure, facilities and equipment under the care and control of the department of fish and
135 game and its divisions, including, but not limited to, buildings and other structures, education
136 centers, district headquarters, hatchery facilities, offices, storage buildings, shooting ranges,
137 archery facilities, dams, laboratories, equipment, vehicles, vessels and site clearance; provided,
138 that funds may be used to incorporate energy efficiency and renewable technologies, to decrease
139 energy use and greenhouse gas emissions, or to increase climate resiliency; enhance
140 accessibility; and provided further, that funds may be used for implementation of projects in
141 furtherance of the statewide hazard mitigation and climate adaptation plan….$15,000,000
7 of 96

142 2300-7030 For the rehabilitation, reconstruction, modernization and decarbonization of
143 the department of fish and game’s division of fisheries and wildlife McLaughlin Hatchery in the
144 town of Belchertown, including but not limited to, new construction, repair and rehabilitation of
145 buildings and grounds….$20,000,000
146 2300-7031 For ecological restoration capital programs and projects in the department of
147 fish and game’s division of ecological restoration, formerly the riverways program; provided that
148 funds authorized by this item may be used for river, wetland and watershed restoration and
149 protection, including but not limited to, dam and barrier removal; streamflow and water quality
150 restoration; road-stream crossing upgrades; improving public access including enhancements to
151 accessibility; restored rivers and wetlands; and other capital activities that restore biodiversity
152 and support nature-based approaches for adapting to climate change; provided further, that the
153 commissioner of fish and game or the commissioner’s designee may enter into cooperative
154 agreements with state and federal agencies, municipalities, non-governmental organizations,
155 regional planning agencies, tribal governments and others; may purchase equipment; and may
156 award grants to public and non-public entities and tribal governments to foster and carry out this
157 item….$40,000,000
158 2300-7032 For the planning, engineering, design, construction, acquisition, development
159 and reconstruction of existing and new coastal and inland access sites identified by the
160 department of fish and game’s office of fishing and boating access including, but not limited to,
161 boat launching facilities, fishermen boat access facilities, car-top boat launching facilities, canoe
162 and kayak access facilities, sport fishing piers and shore fishing areas including, but not limited
163 to, ramps, docks, floats and appurtenant facilities throughout the commonwealth including, but
164 not limited to, enhancements to accessibility, construction of signage and informational kiosks
8 of 96

165 and the implementation of coastal projects developed jointly with the Marine Recreational
166 Fisheries Development Fund….$10,000,000
167 2300-7033 For marine fisheries resource conservation and restoration, and capital
168 support of local commercial and recreational fisheries and for related costs which may include,
169 but shall not be limited to, fish and habitat restoration, hard bottom habitat enhancement,
170 vessels, vehicles and equipment; provided further, that these projects may be carried out in
171 cooperation with public and nonpublic entities, tribal governments and other management
172 agencies; provided further, that the department may award grants to public and nonpublic
173 entities, and tribal governments, to foster and carry out this item….$5,000,000
174 2300-7034 For planning and implementation of capital projects and programs in the
175 department of fish and game and its divisions in furtherance of Executive Order 618,
176 Biodiversity Conservation in Massachusetts, including, but not limited to, a local biodiversity
177 capital grant program to support community led biodiversity efforts; provided further, that these
178 projects and programs may be carried out in cooperation with public and nonpublic entities,
179 tribal governments and other management agencies, including but not limited to other state
180 agencies, municipalities, regional planning agencies, nonprofit organizations; provided further,
181 that the department and its divisions may award grants to public and nonpublic entities, tribal
182 governments and other management agencies, including, but not limited to municipalities,
183 regional planning agencies, nonprofit organizations, to carry out this item….$20,000,000
184 SECTION 2C.
185 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS
186 Office of the Secretary
9 of 96

187 2000-7067 For improvements and replacements to the infrastructure and holdings of the
188 executive office of energy and environmental affairs and its departments and divisions, and for
189 capital assets and improvements to infrastructure and holdings that support the mission of the
190 executive office of energy and environmental affairs; provided, that this may include, but shall
191 not be limited to, buildings, equipment and vehicles; provided further, that investments may
192 support the development and implementation of capital projects that support the integrated state
193 hazard mitigation and climate adaptation plan; provided further, that the secretary of energy and
194 environmental affairs may give priority to critical actions and strategies identified in the plan;
195 provided further that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for
196 planning, prioritization, selection and implementation of projects in furtherance of the goals of
197 climate change mitigation and adaptation and consistent with the integrated state hazard
198 mitigation and climate adaptation plan; provided further, that funds may support development of
199 outdoor recreation sites and facilities and infrastructure; provided further that funds may be
200 granted to public and non-public entities including, but not limited to, tribal governments,
201 municipalities, regional planning agencies and nonprofit organizations or expended directly by
202 the executive office of energy and environmental affairs and its departments and divisions;
203 provided further that any grant funds may be used for planning, engineering, design, acquisition,
204 permitting, construction, repair and renovation; provided further, that grants shall be awarded in
205 a manner that promotes accessibility, supports geographic distribution and supports
206 disadvantaged populations….$73,000,000
207 2030-1011 For the replacement and purchase of environmental law enforcement vehicles
208 and maritime law enforcement patrol vessels and accompanying equipment; provided, that funds
209 may be expended for equipment purchased in conjunction with the operation of the
10 of 96

210 environmental law enforcement vehicle and vessel fleet, including, but not limited to, mobile
211 data terminals, installation of mounts and multi-band radios, search and rescue equipment, boat
212 trailers, engines, lower units, remotely operated vehicles, portable side scan sonar, navigation
213 systems and communication radios….$9,000,000
214 2000-7088 For the municipal vulnerability preparedness grant program to support and
215 provide technical assistance for the commonwealth’s political subdivisions including, but not
216 limited to, cities, towns, counties and districts; tribal governments; regional planning agencies;
217 nonprofit organizations; or any authority, commission, board or instrumentality of the foregoing,
218 to complete climate-related vulnerability assessments, develop equitable, action-oriented
219 resiliency plans and complete integrated climate change adaptation plans and local hazard
220 mitigation plans and to implement local and regional adaptation solutions identified through such
221 plans; provided, that such funds may be used on lands held by municipal, state or federal
222 agencies, tribal governments or other governmental bodies; on lands held by nonprofit
223 organizations; or on private lands with the consent of the owner and subject to covenants that
224 shall assure the continued presence and effectiveness of such projects for the expected life of the
225 projects; provided further, that the use of such funds by municipal governmental bodies on lands
226 held by nonprofit organizations or on private lands shall require the affirmative vote of a
227 majority of the grantee’s legislative body or board of directors or equivalent; provided further,
228 that such funds may be used for the commonwealth’s political subdivisions including, but not
229 limited to, cities, towns, counties and districts; tribal governments; regional planning agencies;
230 nonprofit organizations; or any authority, commission, board or instrumentality of the foregoing,
231 to appoint and retain coordinators to advance sustainability, resiliency and climate
232 adaptation….$315,000,000
11 of 96

233 2000-7086 For the design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, retrofitting, repair
234 or removal of municipally-owned dams, publicly owned dams and other dams for which
235 emergency action or hazard mitigation is required and for inland flood control projects and
236 projects for related facilities and equipment including, but not limited to, seawalls, jetties,
237 revetments, retaining walls, beach nourishment and other nature-based solutions on publicly-
238 owned land or related to state or municipal climate change adaptation and preparedness or for
239 which emergency action or hazard mitigation is required; provided, that the secretary of energy
240 and environmental affairs shall give priority to dams and flood control projects that pose the
241 greatest risk to public health or safety or to the environment; provided further, that funds shall be
242 available for a program of planning, permitting and construction of fish ways and other aquatic
243 habitat improvements, including the removal or breaching of selected dams and impoundments
244 on state-owned land and waterways; provided further, that funds may be used to provide grants
245 to public and charitable organizations, to carry out this item, and provided further, that the
246 secretary may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, selection and implementation of
247 projects in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation and consistent
248 with the integrated state hazard mitigation and climate change adaptation plan….$93,500,000
249 2000-7083 For the design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
250 retrofitting, repair or removal of coastal infrastructure and resilience measures, including, but not
251 limited to, seawalls, jetties, revetments, retaining walls, port infrastructure, beach nourishment,
252 living shorelines, coastal lands and other nature-based solutions, which are defined as strategies
253 that conserve, restore and employ the natural resources of the commonwealth to enhance climate
254 adaptation, build resilience and support mitigation; provided, that costs payable from this item
255 may include, but shall not be limited to, the costs of engineering and other technical assistance
12 of 96

256 and planning services essential to these projects rendered by the office of coastal zone
257 management in the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, the office of waterways
258 in the department of conservation and recreation and other commonwealth employees or
259 consultants; provided further, that grants and loans may be made to local government units to
260 carry out this item; provided further, that grants may also be awarded to non-public entities for
261 approved projects funded herein; provided further, that funds may be used on lands held by
262 municipal, county, state or federal agencies or other governmental bodies, on lands held by
263 nonprofit conservation organizations or on private lands with the consent of the owner and
264 subject to covenants that assure the continued presence and effectiveness of such projects for the
265 expected life of the projects; provided further, that the use of such funds by county and
266 municipal governmental bodies on lands held by nonprofit conservation organizations, or on
267 private lands, shall require, in a county, a vote of the county commissioners, in a city having a
268 Plan D or Plan E charter, by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the members of the city
269 council, in a city not having such a charter, by vote of the city council, subject to the charter of
270 that city and in a town, by a majority vote of the selectboard; provided further, that the secretary
271 of energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, selection
272 and implementation of projects in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and
273 adaptation and consistent with the integrated state hazard mitigation and climate change
274 adaptation plan….$200,000,000
275 2000-7068 For a tree planting greening program for projects throughout the
276 commonwealth on publicly-owned land or on private lands with the consent of the owner and
277 subject to appropriate covenants that shall assure the continued presence and effectiveness of the
278 Commonwealths investment including, but not limited to, the evaluation and planning of tree
13 of 96

279 greening projects, tree stock and planting and capital maintenance of urban trees; provided, that
280 the secretary shall give priority to the planting of trees in cities or towns with a completed tree
281 management plan; provided further, that funds may be used to provide grants to public and
282 nonpublic entities, and tribal governments, to fulfill the purpose of this item….$10,000,000
283 2000-7082 For grant programs related to and investments in land, soil, water and natural
284 resource conservation; open space preservation; and other capital expenditures that conserve land
285 and natural resources that provide ecosystem services such as clean air and water including
286 watershed remediation, water conservation and other capital investments related to water
287 resource protection and flood prevention; coastal resource protection, including, but not limited
288 to, securing access to protected coastal lands and lands to provide for the inland migration of
289 coastal habitats; recreation, including, via grants or agency action, the acquisition, development,
290 construction, rehabilitation and improvement of parks and all related facilities in neighborhoods
291 underserved with parks including assessment and remediation of brownfield sites intended for
292 park use; environmental equity and wildlife and endangered species protection including, but not
293 limited to, the local acquisition for natural diversity grant program, the parkland acquisition and
294 renovation for communities grant program, the tribal land acquisition grant program, the healthy
295 soils grant program, the woodlands partnership grant program, conservation partnership grant
296 programs, including, but not limited to, programs to support landscape-scale land conservation
297 projects, the drinking water supply protection grant program, grant programs to assist and
298 provide funding to conservation districts, grants to support projects and initiatives that promote
299 carbon sequestration and climate change resiliency through sustainable forestry and salt marsh
300 restoration; capital grants and technical assistance to facilitate the conservation of land by
301 municipalities, tribal governments, land trusts and other conservation organizations; MassTrails
14 of 96

302 grants and other capital investments to advance trails of all kinds; and grants and other
303 expenditures to support local, regional and state land use planning and management capabilities
304 to advance smart growth efforts, all pursuant to rules or regulations adopted by the secretary of
305 energy and environmental affairs to effectuate this item; provided, that funds may be used to
306 provide grants to public and nonpublic entities and tribal governments to carry out this item; and
307 provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance
308 and expend funds for planning, prioritization, selection and implementation of projects in
309 furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation, consistent with the
310 integrated state hazard mitigation and climate adaptation plan, and in support of disadvantaged
311 populations; and provided further, that all projects shall provide appropriate public access as
312 determined by the secretary….$120,000,000
313 2000-7087 For the acquisition of land and interests in land by the executive office of
314 energy and environmental affairs and its departments and divisions and for associated costs,
315 including, but not limited to, planning, study, due diligence, title and appraisal services, site
316 restoration, monitoring and stewardship, including, but not limited to, acquisitions for open
317 space, recreation, conservation, wildlife and endangered species protection, forest land protection
318 and for related costs and activities in support of conservation goals, provided that up
319 $25,000,000 may be used to capitalize the Transfer of Development Rights Revolving Fund
320 established under section 35HHH of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided, that funds under
321 this item may be used to develop and implement a capital stewardship program on lands under
322 the care and control of the executive office or its departments and divisions or subject to
323 conservation restrictions or other related interests in land purchased through this item; provided
324 further, that funds may be used for restoration, repair and reclamation of acquired land, including
15 of 96

325 demolition of structures, removal of debris, eradication of non-native species and other services
326 essential to these reclamation efforts; provided further, that the secretary of energy and
327 environmental affairs may provide guidance and expend funds for preservation, and acquisition
328 of land and interests in land in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and
329 adaptation, consistent with the integrated state hazard mitigation and climate adaptation plan, and
330 in support of disadvantaged population….$85,000,000
331
332 SECTION 2D.
333 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS
334 Massachusetts Department of Agricultural Resources
335 2511-0124 For food security grant programs, to support equitable access to nutritious,
336 local food and to strengthen food supply and distribution systems; provided, that programs may
337 take into account the unique needs of rural and urban areas and gateway municipalities as
338 defined in section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws, to provide greater access to local
339 food; provided further, that programs may provide grants that support food banks and other parts
340 of the food distribution channel by expanding services; and provided further, that funds may be
341 used to provide grants to public and nonpublic entities, and tribal governments, to carry out this
342 item, which may include, but are not limited to, farms, retailers, fisheries, food system
343 businesses, food distributors, food processors, food banks, farm stands, food hubs, food retailers,
344 elder services and community supported agriculture farms….$125,000,000
16 of 96

345 2500-7022 For capital programs designed to address agricultural economic and
346 environmental sustainability and resiliency, including, but not limited to, the development and
347 implementation of farm viability plans and other technical and engineering assistance, urban
348 agriculture and hydroponics, and to facilitate improvements to agricultural infrastructure, energy
349 conservation and efficiency and climate change adaptation and resiliency; provided further, that
350 funds may be expended for infrastructure and equipment upgrades to prevent or reduce food
351 safety risk, combat invasive and disease-borne insects, and capital programs to support
352 aquaculture, anaerobic digesters and agricultural composters; provided further, that funds may be
353 expended for capital projects that foster the adoption of sustainable farming practices that
354 enhance resilience, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and promote environmental stewardship;
355 provided further, that funds may be expended on programs that support the Commonwealth’s
356 farmland protection and access goals; provided further, that funds may be expended to provide
357 grants, technical assistance, and other support to farms, public and nonpublic entities, and tribal
358 governments to support the agricultural economy and to enable recovery from natural disasters,
359 market disruptions, and other financial challenges; and provided further, that funds may be
360 allocated by the commissioner through competitive grants pursuant to rules or regulations
361 adopted by the commissioner to implement this item….$26,000,000
362 2511-0125 For a program to acquire land or interests in land for the purpose of
363 preserving agricultural land, including agricultural preservation restrictions under sections 23 to
364 26, inclusive, of chapter 20 of the General Laws; provided, that funds may be expended for
365 associated acquisition and implementation costs, including, but not limited to, grants, planning,
366 due diligence, title examinations, appraisal services, site restoration and capital improvements on
367 non-public APR lands and on state-owned lands leased for agricultural purposes....$42,000,000
17 of 96

368 SECTION 2E.
369 OFFICE OF THE TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL
370 0640-1008 For the water pollution abatement trust established in section 2 of chapter 29C
371 of the General Laws for deposit in the Water Pollution Abatement Revolving Fund established in
372 section 2L of chapter 29 of the General Laws for application by the trust to the purposes
373 specified in section 5 of said chapter 29C, any portion of which may be used as a matching grant
374 by the commonwealth to federal capitalization grants received under Title VI of the federal
375 Clean Water Act or for deposit in the Drinking Water Revolving Fund established in section
376 2QQ of said chapter 29 for application by the trust to the purposes specified in section 18 of said
377 chapter 29C, any portion of which may be used as a matching grant by the commonwealth to
378 federal capitalization grants received under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act; provided, that
379 funds may be used to assist homeowners in complying with the revised Title 5 of the state
380 environmental code for subsurface disposal of sanitary waste; provided further, that funds may
381 be used to assist with per-and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) contamination
382 remediation…..$385,000,000
383 SECTION 2F.
384 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
385 Office of the Secretary
386 1100-2524 For grants to cities, towns, tribal governments, regional organizations whose
387 membership is exclusively composed of municipal governments, municipal redevelopment
388 authorities or agencies, or other state agencies or quasi-governmental agencies to support capital
18 of 96

389 investments that support climate mitigation, adaption, resiliency and recovery efforts in the
390 commonwealth, provided, that purposes may include, but shall not be limited to, planning and
391 studies, preparation of plans and specifications, site assembly and preparation, dispositions,
392 acquisitions, repairs, renovations, improvements, construction, demolition, remediation,
393 modernization and reconstruction of facilities, infrastructure, equipment and other capital
394 assets….50,000,000
395 SECTION 2G.
396 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
397 Office of the Secretary
398 7004-4785 For the Massachusetts Housing Finance Agency established in section 3 of
399 chapter 708 of the acts of 1966, to capitalize a permanent, revolving Residential Production
400 Momentum Fund for the purpose of accelerating the development of mixed-income and
401 workforce multifamily housing production projects by providing financial assistance in the form
402 of innovative, low-cost, and flexible capital funding, which may be in the form of debt, equity, or
403 other instruments, depending on individual underwriting needs of the project; provided, that not
404 less than 20 per cent of the units in a project that receives financial assistance under this item
405 shall be restricted to households with incomes between 60 per cent and 120 per cent, inclusive,
406 of the area median income; provided further, that, notwithstanding paragraph (f) of section 5 of
407 said chapter 708, the Agency may in its discretion set the term and prepayment options for any
408 mortgage or other loan or instrument issued to any project receiving such financial assistance
409 based on the individual underwriting needs of the project; provided further, that such financial
410 assistance shall be awarded in a manner that promotes geographic equity; provided further, that
19 of 96

411 funds expended from this item shall, to the maximum extent feasible, be prioritized for projects
412 that comply with decarbonization and sustainability standards; provided further, that
413 prioritization shall be determined through objective scoring criteria in the Qualified Allocation
414 Plan developed by the executive office of housing and livable communities; provided further,
415 that for new construction projects, the standards set forth in the commonwealth’s Opt-in
416 Specialized Energy Code under 225 CMR 22.00 and 23.00 and the Enterprise Green
417 Communities standards shall be the applicable standards for prioritization; provided further, that
418 any project proposing less than full compliance with said standards shall provide detailed
419 analysis demonstrating why full compliance would render the project infeasible notwithstanding
420 utilization of all available federal and state incentives, including rebates and tax credits; provided
421 further, that for retrofits of existing units, prioritization shall be given to projects that include
422 energy efficiency and electrification decarbonization measures, including, but not limited to,
423 electric or ground source heat pumps, net-zero developments, Passive House Institute
424 certification or an equivalent energy efficiency certification, and all-electric buildings and
425 projects that incorporate green, sustainable and climate-resilient elements; provided further, that
426 projects that include lower embodied carbon construction materials and methods shall be further
427 prioritized…. $50,000,000
428 SECTION 3. Section 48 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
429 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- The Milk Producers
430 Security Fund shall be for the purpose of supporting, through grant programs, dairy farms with a
431 certificate of registration under chapter 94.
20 of 96

432 SECTION 4. Section 6C of chapter 20 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
433 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 3, the figure “18”, and inserting in
434 place thereof the following figure:- 20.
435 SECTION 5. Said section 6C of said chapter 20, as so appearing, is hereby further
436 amended by inserting, after the word “affairs” in line 19, the following words:- 1 of whom shall
437 be the director of the division of marine fisheries of the department of fish and game, or the
438 director’s designee; 1 of whom shall be the director of the University of Massachusetts Center
439 for Agriculture, Food, and the Environment, or the director’s designee;.
440 SECTION 6. Chapter 21 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
441 is hereby amended by inserting after section 2G the following section:-
442 Section 2H. (a) The commissioner shall consider land under the care and control of the
443 department for potential designation and long-term passive management as a forest reserve and
444 shall recommend designation of land as a forest reserve provided that such designation shall: (i)
445 contribute to carbon sequestration and storage as part of the Commonwealth’s climate mitigation
446 strategy; (ii) provide an opportunity for unique older forest habitats to mature and develop over
447 time without intended intervention in ecological processes as part of a holistic, statewide,
448 biodiversity conservation strategy; (iii) enhance climate resilience through the maintenance of
449 connected natural landscape blocks and species movement corridors that provide a variety of
450 important ecosystem processes, functions and services; (iv) provide unique opportunities for
451 compatible passive outdoor recreation and other public enjoyment to serve a diverse public with
452 wide-ranging recreational values; and (v) facilitate ecological research, comparative studies of
21 of 96

453 forest dynamics and long-term monitoring to evaluate reserves as compared to other land
454 management approaches.
455 (b) The commissioner, with the approval of a simple majority of the stewardship council
456 members present at a duly called meeting of the council, may designate land under the care and
457 control of the department a forest reserve. Forest reserves shall be managed consistent with such
458 designation, unless the commissioner, with the approval of not less than a two-thirds majority of
459 the stewardship council present at a duly called meeting of the council, and with the approval of
460 the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, de-designates said land.
461 (c) Designation or de-designation of land as a forest reserve shall constitute an
462 administrative designation and shall not change the entity with respect to the care, custody and
463 control of the land; constitute a change in the use of the land; otherwise dispose of land or an
464 interest in land; or otherwise change the existing status of the land as a state forest, state park or
465 other land management unit.
466
467 (d) The department shall passively manage the forest reserves to allow natural processes
468 to determine changes in the structure and composition of the forest ecosystem to the greatest
469 degree possible. Forest reserves shall not be managed for production of timber or forest products
470 or intentionally manipulated, and active management shall be avoided, even when disturbances
471 occur, to the extent feasible. After consultation with a forest reserve science and technical
472 advisory committee to be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, the
473 department may undertake active management or assisted restoration actions to: (i) sustain
474 ecosystem function, vital ecosystem services and habitat values; (ii) control problematic pests,
22 of 96

475 pathogens and invasive species; (iii) restore water and wetland resources; (iv) protect public
476 safety; or (v) address other unforeseen circumstances. The department may undertake such other
477 management actions as may be required by law.
478 Compatible passive recreational activities, regulated hunting and trapping, conversion or
479 removal of plantations, maintenance or repair of existing forest roads, trails and administrative
480 access points, preservation of historic and cultural resources, removal of immediate threats to
481 public safety, selective understory invasive plant control, and monitoring and research activities
482 shall be permitted within forest reserves.
483 SECTION 7. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
484 section 3G the following section:-
485 Section 3H. (a) The commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations for: (i) the
486 government and use of all property under the control of the department including all roads and
487 highways wholly or in part within the boundaries of such property, including rules and
488 regulations relative to hunting and fishing, except in great ponds, not inconsistent with the laws
489 protecting fish, birds, mammals and quadrupeds; (ii) the government and public use of the
490 Charles river, Mystic river and Neponset river; provided that no such rule or regulation shall
491 affect the water rights of any person, whether a mill owner or otherwise; and (iii) the care,
492 maintenance, protection and policing of the Charles river basin as defined in section 2 of chapter
493 524 of the acts of 1909 and amendments thereof; provided that no such rule or regulation shall
494 impair freight traffic. Such rules and regulations may also provide for the payment of fees and
495 other charges for the parking of vehicles and for the enjoyment of other special privileges within
496 the territory under such control.
23 of 96

497 No such rule or regulation shall prohibit the use of passenger or station wagon type motor
498 vehicles whose gross weight is less than 5,000 pounds and which are registered for commercial
499 use, on ways, parkways or boulevards where non-commercial passenger-type motor vehicles are
500 permitted to operate.
501 The commissioner may enter into and issue agreements, licenses and permits for
502 recreational and other uses, and grant concessions for the sale of refreshments and other articles
503 and the furnishing of services on department property which they deem compatible and
504 consistent with this section and Article XCVII of the amendments to the Constitution, provided,
505 however, that such agreements, licenses and permits shall be for periods not exceeding 10 years,
506 and shall be in writing.
507 (b) Violation of such a rule or regulation shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500,
508 and each day of a continuing violation including unauthorized or unpermitted use and occupation
509 of department property shall be a considered a separate offense.
510 (c) The commissioner may authorize in writing non-criminal enforcement, by department
511 staff, of department rules and regulations relating to parking.
512 A police officer employed by a city or town in whose boundaries department property is
513 located shall have all the same powers they have as a police officer of the city or town to enforce
514 the laws of the commonwealth and the rules and regulations of the department.
515 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fines and penalties recovered for
516 violation of rules and regulations made under authority of this section shall be accounted for by
517 the clerk of the court and forwarded to the department of conservation and recreation to be
518 deposited as revenue.
24 of 96

519 (e) The department may assess a civil administrative penalty, not to exceed $1,000 per
520 day, for the continuing violation of any rule, regulation, order, including without limitation for
521 the use, occupation or alteration of department property without written authorization as required
522 by regulations promulgated by the department, or for noncompliance with such a written
523 authorization. Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate violation. The remedies
524 provided in this paragraph shall be available in addition to any other penalties or remedies
525 provided by law. The department may adopt and promulgate regulations to effectuate the
526 purposes of this paragraph. This penalty shall be assessed in addition to any other civil penalty
527 otherwise provided for by law. Notice of assessment of a penalty pursuant to this section shall be
528 made by service in hand, or by certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall state the amount
529 of the administrative penalty, the date the penalty shall be due, a statement of the violator's right
530 to an adjudicatory hearing pursuant to chapter 30A regarding the assessment, a statement of the
531 actions the person may take in order to avoid assessment of additional penalties or to avoid
532 waiving the right to a hearing relative to the penalty and the manner of acceptable payment if an
533 election to waive a hearing is made. A person or political subdivision of the commonwealth shall
534 be deemed to have waived all right to an adjudicatory hearing unless, within 21 days of the date
535 of the department's notice, a written notice is received by the department, by hand or by certified
536 mail, return receipt requested, requesting such adjudicatory hearing. In the event that such
537 request is not received in accordance with this section, the proposed administrative penalty shall
538 become final and payment shall be due in accordance with the notice.
539 SECTION 8. Paragraph (b) of section 67 of chapter 21 of the General Laws, as appearing
540 in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clauses (ii) and (iii).
25 of 96

541 SECTION 9. Said section 67 of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby further
542 amended by inserting, in line 29, after the word “lands” the following words:- or golf courses.
543 SECTION 10. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
544 section 2JJJJJJ the following 2 sections:-
545 Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
546 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Resilience
547 Revolving Fund. The fund shall be administered by the board of trustees of the Massachusetts
548 Clean Water Trust created under section 2 of chapter 29C. The fund shall be credited with
549 amounts credited or transferred to the fund by the general court or any other source, including,
550 but not limited to: fees or tax revenue specified to be credited to the fund; federal grants; loan
551 repayments; investment earnings on monies in the fund; and any other amounts required to be
552 credited to the trust by operation of law, resolution or agreement entered into by the board. The
553 state treasurer shall be the treasurer-custodian of the fund, and, subject to any applicable trust
554 agreement, the state treasurer is authorized to invest monies held in the fund in such investments
555 as may be legal investments for funds of the commonwealth.
556 Amounts credited to the fund may be used, without further appropriation, to provide for:
557 (i) loans to municipalities, tribal governments and public water and wastewater districts for
558 climate resilient infrastructure projects recommended by the advisory committee; and (ii)
559 technical support for eligible applicants needing assistance for projects to be ready to apply for
560 said loans and program management, to be provided by the executive office for energy and
561 environmental affairs; provided that the amount expended under (ii) shall not exceed the amount
562 approved annually by the board based on a recommendation by the advisory committee.
26 of 96

563 The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for
564 expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund
565 to be in deficit at any point.
566 (b) There shall be an advisory committee to the board consisting of the state treasurer, ex
567 officio, the secretary of administration and finance, ex officio, the secretary of energy and
568 environmental affairs, ex officio, 1 member appointed by the trust and 1 member appointed by
569 the secretary of energy and environmental affairs. Each member of the advisory committee may
570 appoint a designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30. The advisory committee shall
571 recommend eligible climate resilient infrastructure projects and expenditures for technical
572 support and program management to the board for approval for loans in subsection (d). The
573 executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall promulgate regulations setting forth
574 the criteria for a climate resilience project and any key project requirements, including but not
575 limited to the scope of the project, any ongoing requirements and covenants and compliance with
576 subsection (b) of section 283 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 regarding the use of project labor
577 agreements. The advisory committee shall consider only projects for which it has received a
578 certificate issued by the executive office of energy and environmental affairs that approves the
579 project in accordance with regulations and that identifies the specific project requirements,
580 including but not limited to the scope, timeline and costs of the project.
581 (c) The board may provide by resolution for the issuance from time to time of bonds for
582 any purpose of the Resilience Revolving Fund, which bonds shall be issued as special
583 obligations payable solely from the revenues, funds and other assets or property held or to be
584 received by the trust with respect to the Resilience Revolving Fund.
27 of 96

585 The bonds of each issue may be dated, may bear interest at such rate or rates, including
586 rates variable from time to time, and may mature or otherwise be payable or redeemable at such
587 times as the board may determine. The board shall determine the denominations of bonds, the
588 details of their execution and authentication and their places of payment within or without the
589 commonwealth. In case any trustee or officer whose signature appears on any bonds shall cease
590 to be such officer before their delivery, the signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient as
591 if the officer had remained in office until delivery. Bonds may be issued in certificated or
592 uncertificated form, payable to bearer or registered owners, and, if notes, may be made payable
593 to bearer or to order. The board may sell the bonds of the trust at public or private sale at par or
594 for such premium or discount price as it may determine. The board may by resolution delegate to
595 any trustee or officer of the trust the power to determine any of the matters set forth in this
596 section.
597 Bonds of the trust may be secured by a trust agreement between the trust and the bond
598 owners or a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a
599 trust company within or without the commonwealth. A trust agreement may pledge or assign, in
600 whole or in part, any loan agreements and local governmental obligations, and the revenues,
601 funds and other assets or property held or to be received by the trust with respect to the
602 Resilience Revolving Fund, including without limitation all monies and investments on deposit
603 from time to time in the fund or any account of such trust agreement and any contract or other
604 rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether
605 then held or thereafter acquired by the trust, and the proceeds thereof. A trust agreement may
606 contain, without limitation, provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security and
607 remedies of the bondholders, provisions defining defaults and establishing remedies, which may
28 of 96

608 include acceleration and may also contain restrictions on the remedies by individual
609 bondholders. A trust agreement may also contain covenants of the trust concerning the custody,
610 investment and application of monies, the enforcement of loan agreements and local
611 governmental obligations, the issue of additional or refunding bonds, the use of any surplus bond
612 proceeds, the establishment of reserves and the regulation of other matters customarily treated in
613 trust agreements. At the request of the board, the state treasurer shall and is hereby authorized to
614 join in any trust agreement or to otherwise agree with the trust, any lender or any trustee for
615 bondholders to hold the fund in compliance with any covenants and provisions relating to the
616 fund contained in any trust agreement.
617 Bonds may be issued by the trust in the form of lines of credit or other banking
618 arrangements under terms and conditions determined by the board. In addition to other lawful
619 security, bonds may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guarantees, by insurance, by
620 letters or lines of credit or by other credit enhancement issued to the trust or to a trustee or other
621 person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company or other financial institution,
622 within or without the commonwealth; the trust may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, any
623 loan agreements and local governmental obligations and the revenues, funds and other assets and
624 property held or to be received by the trust with respect to the Resilience Revolving Fund, and
625 any contract or other rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into
626 existence and whether then held or thereafter acquired by the trust, and the proceeds thereof, as
627 security for such guarantees or insurance or for the reimbursement to any issuer of a line or letter
628 of credit.
629 The board may by resolution provide for the issue by the trust of interim receipts or
630 temporary bonds, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds are executed and are
29 of 96

631 available for delivery. The board may also provide for replacement of mutilated, destroyed or
632 lost bonds. The trust may purchase and invite offers to tender for purchase any outstanding
633 bonds; provided, however, that no purchase by the trust shall be made at a price, exclusive of
634 accrued interest, if any, exceeding the bond's principal amount or, if greater, its redemption price
635 when next redeemable at the option of the trust. The trust may resell any bonds it purchases in
636 such manner and for such price as it may determine.
637 The board may also issue refunding bonds of the trust for the purpose of paying any
638 bonds at or prior to maturity. Refunding bonds may be issued at any time at or prior to the
639 maturity or redemption or purchase of the refunded bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued in
640 sufficient amounts to pay or provide for payment of the principal of the bonds being refunded,
641 together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest or discount accrued or to accrue to
642 the date of payment, costs of issuance and other expenses and reserves reasonably necessary to
643 achieve the refunding.
644 Bonds of the trust shall be (i) securities in which public officers and agencies, insurance
645 companies, financial institutions, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and
646 others may properly invest funds including capital within their control, and (ii) securities which
647 may be deposited with any public officer or any agency for any purpose for which the deposit of
648 bonds is authorized by law.
649 Bonds issued by the trust shall not be deemed to be a debt or a pledge of the faith and
650 credit of the commonwealth or of any of its political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely
651 from the revenues and monies of the Resilience Revolving Fund and other monies and rights
652 pledged to their payment. Bonds shall recite that neither the commonwealth nor any political
30 of 96

653 subdivision thereof shall be obligated to pay the same and neither the faith and credit nor the
654 taxing power of the commonwealth or any political subdivision is pledged to their payment.
655 Every bond shall recite it is a special obligation payable solely from the revenues, funds, assets
656 or other property of the Resilience Revolving Fund.
657 Bonds of the trust shall be deemed to be investment securities under chapter 106. Bonds,
658 their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all
659 times be exempt from taxation by and within the commonwealth. The trust shall not be required
660 to pay any taxes, assessments or excises upon its income, existence, operation, or assets, monies
661 or revenues.
662 It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company to act as a depository of the fund or
663 trustee under a trust agreement, provided it furnishes indemnification and reasonable security as
664 the board may require. Any assignment or pledge of revenues, funds and other assets and
665 property made by the trust shall be valid and binding and shall be deemed continuously perfected
666 for the purposes of chapter 106 and other laws when made. The revenues, funds and other assets
667 and property, rights therein and thereto and proceeds so pledged and then held or thereafter
668 acquired or received by the trust shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without
669 any physical delivery or segregation or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid
670 and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the
671 trust, whether or not such parties have notice thereof. The trust agreement by which a pledge is
672 created need not be filed or recorded to perfect the pledge except in the records of the board and
673 no filing need be made pursuant to said chapter 106. Any pledge or assignment made by the trust
674 is an exercise of its political and governmental powers, and loan agreements, local governmental
675 obligations, revenues, funds, assets, property and contract or other rights to receive the same and
31 of 96

676 the proceeds thereof which are subject to the lien of a pledge or assignment created under this
677 chapter shall not be applied to any purposes not permitted by the pledge or assignment. Any
678 holder of a bond and any trustee under a trust agreement, except to the extent its rights may be
679 restricted by the trust agreement, may bring suit upon the bonds and may pursue any other legal
680 action to protect and enforce its rights and compel performance of all duties required to be
681 performed by the trust and the board.
682 (d) In addition to the other powers set forth in Chapter 29C, the board shall have the
683 power to make loans and other forms of financial assistance to finance or refinance costs of
684 climate resilient infrastructure projects as authorized by subsection (a), and to acquire, hold and
685 sell local governmental obligations and other instruments evidencing the loans and other forms
686 of financial assistance at such prices and in such manner as the board shall deem advisable and to
687 secure bonds of the trust with loans, local governmental obligations and other instruments.
688 Any municipality, tribal government and public water and wastewater district may apply
689 to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs for a loan to assist in financing the
690 cost of a climate resilient infrastructure project. At the option of the trust, loans may be
691 unsecured or may be secured by local governmental obligations for delivery to the trust to
692 evidence the loan. Each loan shall be made pursuant to a loan agreement between the trust and
693 such entity acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee or other body
694 authorized by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer. The trust shall have such remedies
695 with respect to defaults on such loans as set forth in section 11 of chapter 29C.
696 SECTION 2LLLLLL. (a) For the purposes of this section, “Historic Connecticut River
697 Water Trail” shall mean, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the portion of the
32 of 96

698 Connecticut River beginning at the Holyoke Dam located at river mile 83.4, and ending at the
699 northern border of the municipality of Hatfield located at river mile 104.3.
700 (b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate,
701 non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Historic Connecticut River Water Trail
702 Marking Fund, which shall be administered by the executive office of energy and environmental
703 affairs to support maintenance of the Historic Connecticut River Water Trail.
704 (c) The fund shall be credited with: (i) money transferred to the fund by a municipality;
705 (ii) money transferred to the fund by the municipal gas and electric commission of the city of
706 Holyoke; (iii) money transferred to the fund by the general court and specifically designated to
707 be credited to the fund; (iv) funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to,
708 gifts, grants and donations; and (v) interest earned on such money.
709 (d) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, by the
710 secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the director of the office of
711 law enforcement, the director of the office of outdoor recreation and the chief executive officers
712 of the municipalities of Easthampton, Hadley, Hatfield, Holyoke, Northampton and South
713 Hadley, to ensure the placement of river markers to ensure safe navigable passage and recreation
714 on the Historic Connecticut River Water Trail.
715 (e) The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available
716 for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. For the purpose of accommodating timing
717 discrepancies between the receipt of revenues and related expenditures, the executive office of
718 energy and environmental affairs may incur expenses, and the comptroller shall certify for
33 of 96

719 payment, amounts not to exceed the most recent revenue estimate as certified by the
720 Massachusetts environmental police as reported in the state accounting system.
721 SECTION 11. Section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as inserted by
722 section 10, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “including, but not limited to:” the
723 following words:- any amounts transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection d of section
724 168 of chapter 175 of the General Laws;
725 SECTION 12. Section 62E of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
726 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
727 The secretary may establish priority housing projects consistent with commonwealth land
728 use planning and housing strategies and plans, climate resilient design guidelines and
729 environmental priorities and nature based solutions projects, as categories of projects that are not
730 presumed likely to cause damage to the environment and do not require an environmental impact
731 report regardless of location, provided that such projects meet standards as determined by the
732 secretary. The secretary may determine that a particular project requires an environmental impact
733 report based on review of a notification form submitted under section 62A.
734 SECTION 13. Section 1 of chapter 61 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
735 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “forest products” and
736 inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
737 “Forest products”, wood, timber, Christmas trees, other tree forest growth, carbon
738 sequestration and storage and any other product produced by forest vegetation.
34 of 96

739 SECTION 14. Section 1 of said chapter 61, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
740 striking out, in line 18, the word “including” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
741 which may include, but shall not be limited to.
742 SECTION 15. Section 8 of chapter 61 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
743 amended by striking out, wherever they appear, the words “section 23B of chapter 39” and
744 inserting in place thereof the following words:- sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A.
745 SECTION 16. Said chapter 61 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended
746 by inserting after section 8 the following section:-
747 Section 8A. The department of conservation and recreation shall have a first refusal
748 option to meet a bona fide offer to purchase land proposed for sale subject to section 8 or an
749 option to purchase such land at full and fair market value in the case of conversion, which option
750 shall be subordinate to that of a town or city pursuant to section 8. Except as provided herein, the
751 department shall have all applicable rights and obligations of cities and towns under section 8,
752 including but not limited to the right of entry upon the land, provision of non-exercise notices
753 and recording of notices of exercise at the appropriate registry of deeds. The department or its
754 assignee and the town or city may cooperate for satisfaction of appraisal requirements or other
755 obligations required by either section 8 or this section.
756 If the notice of intent to sell or convert provided to the state forester pursuant to section 8
757 does not contain all the required material, then the department, within 30 days of receipt, shall
758 notify the landowner and town or city in writing that the notice is insufficient and does not
759 comply.
35 of 96

760 A holder of a mortgage shall send written notice of a mortgage foreclosure sale to the
761 commissioner in the same manner as to other parties as required by section 8.
762 A city or town shall provide to the commissioner any notice of public hearing, notice of
763 exercise or non-exercise, and notice of assignment in the same manner, and containing the same
764 materials, as to the landowner pursuant to section 8.
765 The department may assign its option to the division of fisheries and wildlife of the
766 department of fish and game, provided that a notice of assignment shall be recorded pursuant to
767 section 8.
768 The department or its assignee shall exercise its option only after: (i) consultation with
769 the executive office of housing and livable communities and the executive office of economic
770 development; and (ii) a public hearing. Said hearing shall be held pursuant to sections 18 to 25,
771 inclusive, of chapter 30A; within the town or city where the land is located or 1 such town or city
772 if the land crosses a municipal boundary; and prior to submission of a written notice of intent to
773 exercise an option under this section. The department or assignee, at said hearing, shall disclose
774 the reasons for exercise of the option pursuant to this section and identify any assignment by the
775 department. The department or its assignee may comply with this requirement by participating in
776 a scheduled public meeting of a town or city board or commission.
777 The department or its assignee may exercise an option under this section by providing
778 written notice of its intent to the town or city and landowner prior to the end of the same 120-day
779 period available to the town or city for exercise of its option pursuant to section 8. An option so
780 exercised shall be effective at such time as the town or city records a notice of non-exercise with
781 the registry of deeds or that the town’s or city’s option otherwise expires.
36 of 96

782 The department shall record its notice of assignment or notice of exercise within 30 days
783 of the earliest of: receipt by the commissioner of a notice of non-exercise from the town or city;
784 expiration of a town or city option by failure to record a notice of exercise or notice of
785 assignment; or receipt by the commissioner of notice from the landowner of expiration for any
786 other reason.
787 Land acquired by the department or division pursuant to this section shall be permanently
788 dedicated for public purposes specified in Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of
789 the Commonwealth.
790 SECTION 17. Section 14 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
791 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 95 and 112, each time they appear,
792 the words “section 23B of chapter 39” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
793 following words:- sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A.
794 SECTION 18. Said chapter 61A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended
795 by inserting after section 14 the following section:-
796 Section 14A. The department of agriculture shall have a first refusal option to meet a
797 bona fide offer to purchase land proposed for sale subject to section 14 or an option to purchase
798 such land at full and fair market value in the case of conversion, which option shall be
799 subordinate to that of a town or city pursuant to section 14. Except as provided herein, the
800 department shall have all applicable rights and obligations of cities and towns under section 14,
801 including but not limited to the right of entry upon the land, provision of non-exercise notices
802 and recording of notices of exercise at the appropriate registry of deeds. The department or its
37 of 96

803 assignee and the town or city may cooperate for satisfaction of appraisal requirements or other
804 obligations required by section 14 or this section.
805 Any notice of intent to sell or convert required by section 14 and all required
806 accompanying materials shall be provided to the commissioner of the department of agriculture
807 in the same manner as they are conveyed by the landowner to other parties. If the notice of
808 intent to sell or convert provided to the commissioner does not contain all the required material,
809 then the department, within 30 days of receipt, shall notify the landowner and town or city in
810 writing that the notice is insufficient and does not comply.
811 A holder of a mortgage shall send written notice of a mortgage foreclosure sale to the
812 commissioner in the same manner as to other parties as required by section 14.
813 Any city or town shall provide to the commissioner any notice of public hearing, notice
814 of exercise or non-exercise, and notice of assignment in the same manner, and containing the
815 same materials, as to the landowner pursuant to section 14.
816 The department may assign its option to the department of conservation and recreation,
817 provided that a notice of assignment shall be recorded pursuant to section 14.
818 The department or its assignee shall exercise its option only after: (i) consultation with
819 the executive office of housing and livable communities and the executive office of economic
820 development; and (ii) a public hearing. Said hearing shall be held pursuant to sections 18 to 25,
821 inclusive, of chapter 30A; within the town or city where the land is located or 1 such town or city
822 if the land crosses a municipal boundary; and prior to submission of a written notice of intent to
823 exercise an option under this section. The department or assignee, at said hearing, shall disclose
824 the reasons for exercise of the option pursuant to this section and identify any assignment by the
38 of 96

825 department. The department or its assignee may comply with this requirement by participating in
826 a scheduled public meeting of a town or city board or commission.
827 The department or its assignee may exercise an option under this section by providing
828 written notice of its intent to the town or city and landowner prior to the end of the same 120-day
829 period available to the town or city for exercise of its option pursuant to section 14. An option so
830 exercised shall be effective at such time as the town or city records a notice of non-exercise with
831 the registry of deeds or that the town’s or city’s option otherwise expires.
832 The department shall record its notice of assignment or notice of exercise within 30 days
833 of the earliest of: receipt by the commissioner of a notice of non-exercise from the town or city;
834 expiration of a town or city option by failure to record a notice of exercise or notice of
835 assignment; or receipt by the commissioner of notice from the landowner of expiration for any
836 other reason.
837 Land acquired by the department of agricultural resources or the department of
838 conservation and recreation pursuant to this section shall be permanently dedicated for public
839 purposes specified in Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth.
840 SECTION 19. Section 9 of chapter 61B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
841 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, wherever they appear, the words “section
842 23B of chapter 39” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- sections 18 to 25,
843 inclusive, of chapter 30A.
844 SECTION 20. Said chapter 61B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended
845 by inserting after section 9 the following section:-
39 of 96

846 Section 9A. The department of conservation and recreation shall have a first refusal
847 option to meet a bona fide offer to purchase land proposed for sale subject to section 9 or an
848 option to purchase such land at full and fair market value in the case of conversion, which option
849 shall be subordinate to that of a town or city pursuant to section 9. Except as provided herein,
850 the department shall have all applicable rights and obligations of cities and towns under section
851 9, including but not limited to the right of entry upon the land, provision of non-exercise notices
852 and recording of notices of exercise at the appropriate registry of deeds. The department or its
853 assignee and the town or city may cooperate for satisfaction of appraisal requirements or other
854 obligations required by section 9 or this section.
855 If the notice of intent to sell or convert provided to the state forester pursuant to section 9
856 does not contain all the required material, then the department, within 30 days of receipt, shall
857 notify the landowner and town or city in writing that the notice is insufficient and does not
858 comply.
859 A holder of a mortgage shall send written notice of a mortgage foreclosure sale to the
860 commissioner in the same manner as to other parties as required by section 9.
861 Any city or town shall provide to the commissioner any notice of public hearing, notice
862 of exercise or non-exercise, and notice of assignment in the same manner, and containing the
863 same materials, as to the landowner pursuant to section 9.
864 The department may assign its option to the division of fisheries and wildlife of the
865 department of fish and game, provided that a notice of assignment shall be recorded as provided
866 in section 9.
40 of 96

867 The department or its assignee shall exercise its option only after: (i) consultation with
868 the executive office of housing and livable communities and the executive office of economic
869 development; and (ii) a public hearing. Said hearing shall be held pursuant to sections 18 to 25,
870 inclusive, of chapter 30A; within the town or city where the land is located or 1 such town or city
871 if the land crosses a municipal boundary; and prior to submission of a written notice of intent to
872 exercise an option under this section. The department or assignee, at said hearing, shall disclose
873 the reasons for exercise of the option pursuant to this section and identify any assignment by the
874 department. The department or its assignee may comply with this requirement by participating in
875 a scheduled public meeting of a town or city board or commission.
876 The department or its assignee may exercise an option under this section by providing
877 written notice of its intent to the town or city and landowner prior to the end of the same 120-day
878 period available to the town or city for exercise of its option pursuant to section 9. An option so
879 exercised shall be effective at such time as the town or city records a notice of non-exercise with
880 the registry of deeds or that the town’s or city’s option otherwise expires.
881 The department shall record its notice of assignment or notice of exercise within 30 days
882 of the earliest of: receipt by the commissioner of a notice of non-exercise from the town or city;
883 expiration of a town or city option by failure to record a notice of exercise or notice of
884 assignment; or receipt by the commissioner of notice from the landowner of expiration for any
885 other reason.
886 Land acquired by the department of conservation and recreation or the department of fish
887 and game pursuant to this section shall be permanently dedicated for public purposes specified in
888 Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth.
41 of 96

889 SECTION 21. Section 2 of chapter 91 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
890 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 22, the words “and council” and
891 inserting in place thereof the following words:- or a designee.
892 SECTION 22. Section 2A of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
893 striking out, each time they appear, in lines 11, 15, and 20, the words “and council” and inserting
894 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- or a designee.
895 SECTION 23. Section 4 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
896 striking out, in line 4, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following
897 words:- or a designee.
898 SECTION 24. Section 5 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
899 striking out, in line 1, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following
900 words:- or a designee.
901 SECTION 25. Section 6 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
902 striking out, in lines 9 and 10, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the
903 following words:- or a designee.
904 SECTION 26. Section 9A of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
905 striking out, in lines 17 and 18, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the
906 following words:- or a designee.
907 SECTION 27. Section 13 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
908 striking out, in lines 11 and 12, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the
909 following words:- or a designee.
42 of 96

910 SECTION 28. Section 14 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
911 striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following
912 words:- or a designee.
913 SECTION 29. Section 18 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
914 striking out, in lines 55 and 56, the words “newspaper or newspapers having a circulation in the
915 area affected by said license at the expense of the applicant” and inserting in place thereof the
916 following words:- manner specified by the department in regulations for the area affected by said
917 license at the expense of the applicant. Until such regulations become effective, said notice shall
918 be published at the same time as the preceding notices in a newspaper or newspapers having
919 circulation in the area affected by said license at the expense of the applicant.
920 SECTION 30. Section 18 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
921 by striking out the tenth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
922 No license shall be granted for private tidelands unless, upon or prior to applying for a
923 license pursuant to this section, the applicant shall submit to the clerk of the affected cities or
924 towns where the work is to be performed, the application containing the proposed use, the
925 location, dimensions and limits and mode of work to be performed.
926 SECTION 31. Chapter 91 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
927 section 18C the following 2 sections:-
928 Section 18D. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
929 department may issue a general license and general permit authorizing dredging, fill and
930 structures associated with certain activities and projects, as specified by the department, in
931 tidelands, great ponds, rivers and streams, otherwise subject to individual licensing under
43 of 96

932 sections 12, 12A, 13, 14, 18 and 19, including, but not limited to: (i) marsh restoration and other
933 ecosystem creation or restoration activities, such as vegetative plantings and streambed alteration
934 that could include wads, and pedestrian bridge crossings; (ii) nature based solutions projects; (iii)
935 culvert replacements, including but not limited to those associated with bridges; (iv) great pond
936 drawdowns; (v) dredging and placement of benthic barriers for invasive vegetation
937 removal/harvesting; (vi) aquaculture not eligible for a permit or license under section 10A; (vii)
938 dredging associated with activities not subject to licensing or permitting; (viii) temporary
939 navigational and access impacts that last less than 1 year and are associated with activities not
940 subject to licensing or permitting; (ix) pipelines, cables, conduits, sewers and similar structures
941 installed under flowed tidelands or great ponds that are entirely embedded in the soil and that are
942 installed by horizontal directional drilling or micro tunneling methods; (x) placement of cultch;
943 and (xi) any other activities and projects that the department determines through regulations to be
944 subject to a general license or permit.
945 (b) Projects beyond any established harbor line shall not be eligible for coverage under a
946 general license or permit under this section unless said project is specifically authorized by law,
947 or, if not so authorized, is limited to dredging activities or a structure or fill that is entirely
948 embedded in the soil and does not in any part occupy or project into such tidewater beyond the
949 harbor line, provided also that the department may at any time require any structure or fill to be
950 removed or relocated if channel changes or alteration demands the same, as required by section
951 14; and provided that this subsection shall not affect the eligibility of projects in areas without
952 established harbor lines.
44 of 96

953 (c) The department may consider the cumulative impacts of activities in a geographic
954 area in determining whether a particular project is appropriate for coverage under a general
955 license or permit.
956 (d) The licensee or permittee shall comply with all general license or permit standards to
957 be issued as regulations by the department and any specific conditions prescribed by the
958 department pursuant to the general license or permit.
959 (e) A proponent of a project eligible for coverage under a general license or permit under
960 this section shall certify compliance with its terms and conditions to the department and shall pay
961 all applicable fees required by this chapter before beginning construction. The department may
962 perform annual audits to monitor compliance with the general license or permit requirements of
963 this section.
964 (f) (1) Upon or prior to applying for coverage under a general license or permit pursuant
965 to this section, the project proponent shall: (i) submit to the planning board of a city or town
966 where the work is to be performed and to the clerk of said city or town a statement of the
967 proposed use, the location, dimensions and limits and mode of work to be performed; (ii) provide
968 notice to the selectmen of the town or the mayor of the city and the conservation commission of
969 the town or city where the work is to be performed; and (iii) provide public notice in a manner
970 specified by the department by regulation.
971 (2) The project proponent shall specify by metes, bounds and otherwise the location,
972 dimensions and limits and mode of performing the work and shall submit a plan of the work or
973 structure in its application to the department for coverage under the general license or permit.
45 of 96

974 (3) A department certification for the general license for a project shall be void unless,
975 within 60 days after certification, the department certification and the accompanying plan are
976 recorded in the registry of deeds for the county or district in which the work is to be performed.
977 Work or change in use shall not commence until the department general license certification is
978 recorded and the department has received notification of said recordation. Such recording
979 requirement shall not apply to a certification to the general permit.
980 (4) Assessments for tidewater displacement and occupation of commonwealth tidelands
981 shall be paid by the project proponent in its application for coverage to the department.
982 (g) Any change in use or structural alteration of a licensed or permitted structure or fill
983 shall require a new application to the department and, for projects seeking new coverage under a
984 general license or general permit, compliance with the requirements of subsection (f). Any
985 unauthorized substantial change in use or unauthorized substantial structural alteration shall
986 render coverage under the general license or permit void. Coverage under the general license or
987 permit granted by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be revocable by the department
988 for noncompliance with the conditions set forth therein. The department shall not revoke
989 coverage under any general license or permit until it has given written notice of the alleged
990 noncompliance to the licensee or permittee and those persons who have filed a written request
991 for such notice with the department and afforded them a reasonable opportunity to correct said
992 noncompliance.
993 (h) Section 18 and section 20 shall not apply to projects subject to a general license or
994 permit; provided, however, that the project proponent shall submit to the department plans of any
46 of 96

995 proposed work to be performed and a copy of any legislative grant in its application for coverage
996 to the department.
997 (i) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section. Such regulations
998 shall prescribe which activities are eligible for the general license or general permit, as well as
999 those projects that may allow for fill or structures to acclimatize to natural conditions, so long as
1000 they do not significantly interfere with any rights held by the commonwealth in trust for the
1001 public to use tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for lawful purposes and public rights of
1002 access on private tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for any lawful use.
1003 The department shall submit any regulations promulgated under this section to the joint
1004 committee on natural resources and agriculture, and the senate and house committees on ways
1005 and means, for their review within 60 days prior to the effective date of said regulations.
1006 Section 18E. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1007 department may issue a general license authorizing priority housing projects consistent with
1008 commonwealth land use planning and housing strategies and plans, climate resilient design
1009 guidelines and environmental priorities in tidelands otherwise subject to individual licensing
1010 under sections 12, 12A, 13, 14, 18 and 19.
1011 (b) Projects beyond any established harbor line shall not be eligible for coverage under a
1012 general license under this section unless said project is specifically authorized by law, or, if not
1013 so authorized, is limited to dredging activities or a structure or fill that is entirely embedded in
1014 the soil and does not in any part occupy or project into such tidewater beyond the harbor line,
1015 provided also that the department may at any time require any structure or fill to be removed or
1016 relocated if channel changes or alteration demands the same, as required by section 14; and
47 of 96

1017 provided that this subsection shall not affect the eligibility of projects in areas without
1018 established harbor lines.
1019 (c) The department may consider the cumulative impacts of activities in a geographic
1020 area in determining whether a particular project is appropriate for coverage under a general
1021 license.
1022 (d) The licensee shall comply with all general license standards issued by regulations by
1023 the department and any specific conditions prescribed by the department pursuant to the general
1024 license.
1025 (e) A proponent of a project eligible for coverage under a general license under this
1026 section shall certify compliance with its terms and conditions to the department and shall pay all
1027 applicable fees required by this chapter before beginning construction. The department may
1028 perform annual audits to monitor compliance with the general license requirements of this
1029 section.
1030 (f) (1) Upon or prior to applying for coverage under a general license pursuant to this
1031 section, the project proponent shall: (i) submit to the planning board of a city or town where the
1032 work is to be performed and to the clerk of said city or town a statement of the proposed use, the
1033 location, dimensions and limits and mode of work to be performed; (ii) provide notice to the
1034 selectmen of the town or the mayor of the city and the conservation commission of the town or
1035 city where the work is to be performed; and (iii) provide public notice in a manner specified by
1036 the department by regulation.
48 of 96

1037 (2) The project proponent shall specify by metes, bounds and otherwise the location,
1038 dimensions and limits and mode of performing the work and shall submit a plan of the work or
1039 structure in its application to the department for coverage under the general license.
1040 (3) A department certification for the general license for a project shall be void unless,
1041 within 60 days after certification, the department certification and the accompanying plan are
1042 recorded in the registry of deeds for the county or district where the work is to be performed.
1043 Work or change in use shall not commence until the department general license certification is
1044 recorded and the department has received notification of said recordation.
1045 (4) Assessments for tidewater displacement and occupation of commonwealth tidelands
1046 shall be paid by the project proponent in its application for coverage to the department.
1047 (g) Any change in use or structural alteration of a licensed structure or fill shall require a
1048 new application to the department and, for projects seeking new coverage under a general
1049 license, compliance with the requirements of subsection (f). Any unauthorized substantial change
1050 in use or unauthorized substantial structural alteration shall render coverage under the general
1051 license void. Coverage under the general license granted by the department pursuant to this
1052 chapter shall be revocable by the department for noncompliance with the conditions set forth
1053 therein. The department shall not revoke coverage under any general license until it has given
1054 written notice of the alleged noncompliance to the licensee and those persons who have filed a
1055 written request for such notice with the department and afforded them a reasonable opportunity
1056 to correct said noncompliance.
1057 (h) Sections 18 and 20 shall not apply to projects subject to a general license; provided,
1058 however, that the project proponent shall submit to the department plans of any proposed work to
49 of 96

1059 be performed and a copy of any legislative grant in its application for coverage to the
1060 department.
1061 (i) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section. Such regulations
1062 shall prescribe which activities are eligible for the general license, as well as those projects that
1063 may allow for fill or structures to acclimatize to natural conditions, so long as they do not
1064 significantly interfere with any rights held by the commonwealth in trust for the public to use
1065 tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for lawful purposes and public rights of access on
1066 private tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for any lawful use.
1067 The department shall submit any regulations promulgated under this section to the joint
1068 legislative committee on natural resources and agriculture, to the senate committee on ways and
1069 means and to the house committee on ways and means, for their review within 60 days prior to
1070 the effective date of said regulations.
1071 SECTION 32. Section 31 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1072 striking out, in line 9, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following
1073 words:- or a designee.
1074 SECTION 33. Section 35 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1075 adding the following paragraphs:--
1076 Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the Commonwealth shall retain title to any
1077 waters or land below the low water line of a great pond in perpetuity. Persons passing by foot
1078 over areas between high water and low water lines of a great pond shall not be in violation of
1079 section 120 of chapter 266 nor subject to arrest for trespass provided they remain within an area
1080 that a reasonable person would believe to be below the high-water line, which shall include areas
50 of 96

1081 of wet sand and areas below the seaweed line. In areas where natural processes, with or without
1082 human intervention, have caused the landward or lateral movement of a barrier beach into an
1083 area below the historic low water line of any great pond, the portion of the barrier beach
1084 relocated into the former bottom of the great pond shall be and remain in Commonwealth
1085 ownership in perpetuity; provided that this paragraph shall not convert ownership of any portion
1086 of private property to public ownership in violation of Article X of Part the First of the
1087 Constitution of the Commonwealth or the Fourteenth Amendment of the United States
1088 Constitution.
1089 For the purposes of the preceding paragraph, barrier beach shall mean a narrow low-lying
1090 strip of land generally consisting of coastal beaches and coastal dunes extending roughly parallel
1091 to the trend of the coast. It is separated from the mainland by a narrow body of fresh, brackish or
1092 saline water or a marsh system. A barrier beach may be joined to the mainland at one or both
1093 ends.
1094 SECTION 34. Section 33 of chapter 92 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1095 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the fourth paragraph.
1096 SECTION 35. Section 34B of said chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1097 striking out subsections (c) and (d).
1098 SECTION 36. Sections 37 and 38 of said chapter 92, as so appearing, are hereby
1099 repealed.
1100 SECTION 37. Section 42 of chapter 92 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1101 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place
1102 thereof the following sentence:- The commission may grant to towns or to another water or
51 of 96

1103 sewer authority or district locations for common sewers and drains or water supply infrastructure
1104 in and across roadways and any associated rights of way under its care and control.
1105 SECTION 38. Said section 42 of said chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby further
1106 amended by inserting, in line 3, after the word “sewer”, the following words:- or water supply
1107 infrastructure of a town.
1108 SECTION 39. Section 150A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
1109 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence in the twenty-first
1110 paragraph the following 3 sentences:-
1111 Personnel or authorized agents of the department may at all reasonable times enter any
1112 premises, public or private, for the purpose of investigating, sampling or inspecting any records,
1113 condition, equipment, practice or property relating to activities subject to this section, and may at
1114 any time enter such premises for the purpose of protecting the public health or safety, or to
1115 prevent damage to the environment. For the purposes of any entry described in the preceding
1116 sentence, no warrant shall be required, provided, however, that upon demand by the owner or
1117 person in control of such premises, a warrant authorizing such entry and inspection shall be
1118 sought after such demand. Any court, judge, or justice authorized to issue warrants in criminal
1119 cases may issue such warrants.
1120 SECTION 40. Section 2B of chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1121 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last sentence and inserting in place
1122 thereof the following 2 sentences:-
1123 Whoever violates any provision of this section or section 2A or of any rule or regulation
1124 made thereunder shall be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for
52 of 96

1125 not more than 2 ½ years, or both; or by a civil administrative penalty issued by the department
1126 not to exceed $500 per offense, provided that total administrative penalties assessed in any given
1127 action under this section shall not exceed $10,000. Each violation shall constitute a separate
1128 offense, and each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.
1129 SECTION 41. Section 2C of said chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
1130 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 12, after the word “owner” the
1131 following words:- , trainer or driver.
1132 SECTION 42. Said section 2C of said chapter 128, as so appearing, is hereby further
1133 amended by inserting, in line 13, after the word “by” the following words:- , trained by, driven
1134 by.
1135 SECTION 43. Said section 2C of said chapter 128, as so appearing, is hereby further
1136 amended by inserting after the third paragraph the following 3 paragraphs:-
1137 Any owner, trainer, or driver of any animal that tests positive for the presence of drugs in
1138 any other state shall be prohibited from entering any animal in a drawing contest in the
1139 commonwealth for 2 years from the date of any such drug test, provided, however, that the
1140 commissioner may authorize a lesser prohibition of not less than 1 year for good cause.
1141 Notification from any other state of a positive test shall be prima facie evidence that a
1142 drug has been administered and shall result in automatic prohibition from entry in a drawing
1143 contest in the commonwealth without further testing or investigation required by the department.
1144 Any animal participating in a contest conducted under the provisions of paragraph (f) of
1145 section 2 shall have an RFID or microchip implant for identification purposes. The pull
53 of 96

1146 superintendent or the assistant pull superintendent at such contest shall verify the animal's
1147 identification at the time of weigh-in and at the time of entry for the purposes of ensuring the
1148 animal has not tested positive for the presence of drugs in violation of section 2C.
1149 SECTION 44. Sections 13A and 13B of chapter 128 of the General Laws are hereby
1150 repealed.
1151 SECTION 45. Chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
1152 Edition, is hereby amended by striking out sections 51 through 63, inclusive, and inserting in
1153 place thereof the following 11 sections:-
1154 Section 51. As used in sections 51 to section 61, inclusive, the following words shall have
1155 the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
1156 “Commercial feed”, all materials or combination of materials which are distributed or
1157 intended for distribution for use as feed or for mixing in feed, unless such materials are
1158 specifically exempted by the department.
1159 “Customer-formula feed”, commercial feed which consists of a mixture of commercial
1160 feeds or feed ingredients, each batch of which is manufactured according to the specific
1161 instructions of the final purchaser.
1162 “Distribute”, to offer for sale, sell, exchange, barter, supply, furnish, or otherwise provide
1163 commercial feed.
1164 “Drug”, any article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or
1165 prevention of disease in animals other than man; and articles other than commercial feed
1166 intended to affect the structure or any function of the animal body.
54 of 96

1167 “Feed”, any substance that is intended for use as food for animals other than humans;
1168 provided, further that “feed” shall include commercial feed and feed ingredients.
1169 “Label”, a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container
1170 in which a commercial feed is distributed, or on the invoice or delivery slip with which a
1171 commercial feed is distributed.
1172 “Manufacture”, to grind, mix or blend, or further process a commercial feed for
1173 distribution.
1174 “Official sample”, a sample of commercial feed taken by the department in accordance
1175 with the provisions of section sixty of this chapter.
1176 “Person”, individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, cooperative,
1177 business trust, business association, or entity.
1178 Section 52. (a) No person shall manufacture or distribute commercial feed in the
1179 commonwealth without first obtaining from the department a registration for such feed.
1180 (b) An application for registration for a commercial feed pursuant to subsection (a) shall
1181 include at a minimum, but shall not be limited to:
1182 (i) the name and address of any applicants;
1183 (ii) the name and address of the premises of the applicant’s commercial feed operation;
1184 (iii) a label or other printed matter describing the commercial feed;
1185 (iv) a written consent allowing the department to conduct both scheduled and random
1186 inspections, including but not limited to for-cause inspections in response to complaints made to
55 of 96

1187 the department, of and around the premises on which the commercial feed is being manufactured
1188 or distributed;
1189 (v) a nonrefundable application fee in an amount that shall be established by the
1190 department by regulation; and
1191 (vi) any other information as the department may require by regulation.
1192 (c) Upon approval by the department, a copy of the registration shall be furnished to the
1193 applicant and the applicant shall be required to submit a registration fee in an amount to be
1194 determined by the department by regulation. All registrations shall expire on December 31 of
1195 each year. Failure to submit all required application materials and information as outlined in
1196 subsection (b) shall result in non-issuance of the registration until such time as all application
1197 requirements have been satisfied to the department’s approval.
1198 (d) Persons who have registered a commercial feed pursuant to section 53 shall notify the
1199 department of any changes in the guarantee of either chemical or ingredient composition of such
1200 feed not less than 30 days prior to the registrant’s intended manufacture or distribution of such
1201 feed in the commonwealth. New registration of the product shall not be required if the
1202 department determines there is satisfactory evidence that such change would not result in
1203 lowering the feed value of the product for the purpose for which it was designed.
1204 (e) The department may refuse the registration of any application not in compliance with
1205 sections 51 to 61, inclusive, or regulations issued thereunder, and may cancel any registration
1206 subsequently found to violate any provision thereof; provided, however, that no application shall
1207 be refused and no registration shall be cancelled until the applicant or registrant has been
1208 provided the opportunity to amend the application or otherwise obtain an adjudicatory hearing
56 of 96

1209 pursuant to chapter 30A and the regulations promulgated thereunder concerning the refusal or
1210 cancellation.
1211 Section 53. (a) A commercial feed manufactured or distributed in the commonwealth
1212 shall be labeled in compliance with this section.
1213 (b) Commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, shall be accompanied by a label
1214 bearing at a minimum the following information:
1215 (i) the quantity statement;
1216 (ii) the product name and the brand name, if any, under which the commercial feed is
1217 distributed;
1218 (iii) the guaranteed analysis stated in such terms as the department by regulation
1219 determines is required to advise the user of the composition of the commercial feed or to support
1220 claims made in the labeling;
1221 (vi) The ingredient statement stated in such terms as the department by regulation
1222 determines is required, including but not limited to the common or usual name of each ingredient
1223 used in the manufacture of the commercial feed: provided, that the department by regulation may
1224 permit the use of a collective term for a group of ingredients which perform a similar function, or
1225 the department may exempt such commercial feeds, or any group thereof, from this requirement
1226 of an ingredient statement if the department finds that such statement is not required in the
1227 interest of consumers;
1228 (v) the name and principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible
1229 for distributing the commercial feed;
57 of 96

1230 (vi) Such use directions or precautionary statements as the department by regulation
1231 determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the commercial feed, including but not
1232 limited to adequate directions for use for all commercial feeds containing drugs;
1233 (vii) the date of manufacture, processing, packaging, or repackaging or a code that
1234 permits the determination of a date of manufacture; and
1235 (viii) any other information as the department by regulation may require.
1236 (c) A customer-formula feed shall be accompanied by a label, invoice, delivery slip, or
1237 other shipping document, bearing, at a minimum, the following information:
1238 (i) name and address of the manufacturer;
1239 (ii) name and address of the purchaser;
1240 (iii) date of delivery;
1241 (iv) the product name and quantity statement of each commercial feed and each other
1242 ingredient used in the mixture;
1243 (v) such use directions and precautionary statements as may be determined by the
1244 department by regulation that are necessary for the safe and effective use of the customer-feed
1245 formula, including but not limited to adequate directions for use for all customer-formula feeds
1246 containing drugs;
1247 (vi) a statement on the label or labeling that states: “This feed was manufactured
1248 according to specific instructions provided by (name of person who provided the instructions)
1249 and cannot be sold to any other person.”;
58 of 96

1250 (vii) the date of manufacture, processing, packaging, or repackaging or a code that
1251 permits the determination of a date of manufacture; and
1252 (viii) any other information required by regulation.
1253 Section 54. (a) Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a commercial feed
1254 manufactured or distributed in the commonwealth shall be deemed to be misbranded if:
1255 (i) its labeling is false, deceptive, or misleading in any particular;
1256 (ii) it is sold or distributed under the name of another commercial feed;
1257 (iii) it is not labeled as required in section 53 or associated regulations;
1258 (iv) it purports to be or is represented as a commercial feed, or if it purports to contain or
1259 is represented as containing a commercial feed ingredient, unless such commercial feed or feed
1260 ingredient conforms to the definition, if any, prescribed by regulation by the department. In the
1261 absence of a prescribed definition by the department, the department may rely upon and apply
1262 the commonly accepted definitions issued by the Association of American Feed Control
1263 Officials; or
1264 (v) it is otherwise determined by the department to be misbranded pursuant to sections 51
1265 through 61, inclusive, or associated regulations.
1266 Section 55. Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a commercial feed manufactured
1267 or distributed in the commonwealth shall be deemed to be adulterated if:
1268 (i) it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it
1269 injurious to human or animal health; provided, however, that if the substance is not an added
59 of 96

1270 substance, such commercial feed shall not be considered adulterated under this subsection if the
1271 quantity of such substance in such commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to
1272 human or animal health;
1273 (ii) it bears or contains any added poisonous, deleterious or non- nutritive substance
1274 which is unsafe within the meaning of section 406 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
1275 (iii) it is, or it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of
1276 section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
1277 (iv) it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which
1278 is unsafe within the meaning of section 408(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
1279 (v) it is, or it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of
1280 section 721 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act. It is, or it bears or contains any new
1281 animal drug which is unsafe within the meaning of section 512 of the Federal Food, Drug, and
1282 Cosmetic Act;
1283 (vi) it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance, or if it
1284 is otherwise unfit for feed;
1285 (vii) it has been prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may
1286 have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;
1287 (viii) it is, in whole or in part, the product of a diseased animal or of an animal which has
1288 died otherwise than by slaughter which is unsafe within the meaning of section 402(a)(1) or (2)
1289 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
60 of 96

1290 (ix) its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is
1291 represented to possess by its labeling;
1292 (x) it contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for its
1293 manufacture, processing, or packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice
1294 regulations as may be promulgated by the department to assure that the drug meets the
1295 requirements of sections 51 to 61, inclusive, as to safety and has the identity and strength and
1296 meets the quality and purity characteristics which it purports or is represented to possess;
1297 (xi) it is manufactured or distributed or used as commercial feed in a manner that does
1298 not conform with, or contains any substance that is prohibited by, any regulations as may be
1299 promulgated by the department under sections 51 through 61, inclusive; or
1300 (xii) it is otherwise determined by the department to be adulterated pursuant to sections
1301 51 through 61, inclusive, or associated regulations.
1302 Section 56. The following acts and the causing thereof within the commonwealth are
1303 hereby prohibited:
1304 (i) the adulteration or misbranding of any commercial feed;
1305 (ii) the manufacture or distribution of any commercial feed that is adulterated or
1306 misbranded.
1307 (iii) the use of any feed that is adulterated for any cattle, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, or
1308 any other animals if such animals are raised to produce human food;
1309 (iv) the removal or disposal of a commercial feed in violation of section 60 or associated
1310 regulations;
61 of 96

1311 (v) the failure or refusal to register in accordance with section 52 of this chapter or the
1312 regulations that may be promulgated thereunder by the department;
1313 (vi) the failure to maintain any records required by sections 51 through 61, inclusive, or
1314 associated regulations;
1315 (vii) the impediment, obstruction, or hindering by any person of the department in the
1316 discharge of the authority or duties conferred or imposed by any provisions of sections 51
1317 through 61, inclusive, or associated regulations
1318 (viii) any sale, offer, or exposure for sale of any commercial feed or mixture thereof by
1319 any person in violation of any regulation promulgated under sections 51 through 61, inclusive;
1320 (ix) the failure to comply with any other provision of sections 51 through 61, inclusive, or
1321 associated regulations and not otherwise specified in this section; or
1322 (x) such other acts as may be determined by the department by regulation to violate
1323 sections 51 through 61, inclusive.
1324 Section 57. (a) The department is authorized to promulgate such regulations for
1325 commercial feeds as are specifically authorized in sections 51 through 61, inclusive, and
1326 associated regulations.
1327 (b) The promulgation of regulations pursuant to sections 51 through 61, inclusive, shall
1328 conform to the applicable provisions of chapter 30A and associated regulations.
1329 (c) The department may cooperate and enter into agreements with governmental agencies
1330 of the commonwealth, of other states, and of the federal government to effectuate the purpose
1331 and provisions of sections 51 through 61, inclusive.
62 of 96

1332 (d) The department may adopt by regulation and enforce federal standards concerning
1333 commercial feed as it deems necessary to effectuate the purpose and provisions of sections 51
1334 through 61, inclusive.
1335 Section 58. (a) For the purpose of enforcement of sections 51 through 61, inclusive, and
1336 any regulations promulgated thereunder, and in order to determine whether their provisions have
1337 been complied with, including but not limited to whether or not any operations may be subject to
1338 such provisions, officers or employees duly designated by the department, upon presenting
1339 appropriate credentials, are authorized:
1340 (i) to enter, during normal business hours, any building, structure, land, vehicle, or other
1341 premises, public or private, within the commonwealth, in or on which commercial feeds are
1342 manufactured, processed, packed, distributed, transported, stored, disposed of, used, or held for
1343 distribution, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold such feeds; and
1344 (ii) to inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable
1345 manner, including but not limited to scheduled visits, random visits, or for-cause visits made in
1346 response to a complaint of alleged violation received by the department, such premises, property,
1347 or vehicle and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers and labeling
1348 therein.
1349 (iii) the inspection may include but shall not be limited to obtaining samples and the
1350 verification of records and production and control procedures related to the manufacture,
1351 distribution, storage, handling, use or disposal of commercial feed as may be necessary to
1352 determine compliance with sections 51 through 61, inclusive.
63 of 96

1353 (b) The department may promulgate regulations to effectuate this section, including but
1354 not limited to regulations that define notice requirements prior to inspection, official sampling
1355 and analysis procedures, recordkeeping requirements and any other requirements as may be
1356 determined by the department as necessary.
1357 (c) If the owner or owner’s agent of any building, structure, land, vehicle, or other
1358 premises or property described in subsection (a) refuses to admit the department to inspect in
1359 accordance with subsection (a), the department is authorized to obtain from the court for the
1360 district or county in which such building, structure, land, vehicle, or other premises or property is
1361 located an administrative warrant to enter and inspect such building, structure, land, vehicle, or
1362 other premises or property and to sample such feeds, feed ingredients, or raw agricultural
1363 commodities according to section 58, prior to entry, inspection and sampling. The district and
1364 superior courts are empowered to issue such warrants upon a proper showing of the need for
1365 such entry, inspection and sampling.
1366 Section 59. (a) The department may obtain official samples of all commercial feeds
1367 manufactured or distributed in the commonwealth. Such samples may be obtained during
1368 inspections as defined by section fifty-nine of this chapter and any regulations as may be
1369 promulgated thereunder by the department and may be analyzed by the department to determine
1370 compliance with sections 51 through 61, inclusive, and associated regulations.
1371 (b) The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded by the department to
1372 the person named on the label and to the purchaser. When the inspection and analysis of an
1373 official sample indicates a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded, and upon
1374 request within a time period to be established by the department by regulation, following the
64 of 96

1375 receipt of the analysis, the department may furnish to the manufacturer a portion of the sample
1376 concerned. The department, in determining whether a commercial feed is deficient in any
1377 component, shall be guided by the official sample as defined in section 51 and obtained and
1378 analyzed in accordance with section 59.
1379 Section 60. (a) The department shall have authority to enforce sections 51 to 61,
1380 inclusive.
1381 (b) The department may take all reasonable action to ensure that no commercial feed
1382 violating sections 51 through 61, inclusive, and associated regulations enters commerce in the
1383 commonwealth, including but not limited to orders for stop sale, quarantine, detainment,
1384 withdrawal from distribution, condemnation, confiscation, destruction, or any other actions as
1385 may be determined by the department by regulation as necessary to effectuate this section.
1386 (c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of sections 51 through 61, inclusive, whoever
1387 violates any provision of these sections or offers any hindrance to the carrying out of any part
1388 thereof, or after receipt of written request from the department unreasonably refuses or neglects
1389 to comply with any order or regulation lawfully made under this section, may be subject to a
1390 civil administrative penalty issued by the department. The notice of assessment of civil
1391 administrative penalty shall include, but not be limited to, the amount of the penalty, the date the
1392 penalty shall be due, a statement of the violator’s right to an adjudicatory hearing pursuant to this
1393 section and chapter 30A regarding the assessment, and the manner of acceptable payment if an
1394 election to waive a hearing is made. A person shall be deemed to have waived all right to an
1395 adjudicatory hearing unless, within 21 days of the date of the department's notice, the person
1396 files a written notice, by hand or by certified mail, return receipt requested, requesting such
65 of 96

1397 adjudicatory hearing. In the event that such request is not received in accordance with this
1398 section, the proposed civil administrative penalty shall become final and payment shall be due in
1399 accordance with the notice.
1400 (d) Without alleging or proving the lack of other adequate remedies at law, and
1401 notwithstanding the existence of any other remedies at law, the attorney general may apply for a
1402 temporary or permanent injunction to restrain any violation of sections 51 through 61, inclusive,
1403 or associated regulations.
1404 (e) The remedies provided in this section are available in addition to, and without
1405 limiting, any other penalties provided by law or equity, in this chapter or elsewhere. The district
1406 and superior courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction to enforce this chapter and restrain
1407 violations thereof. Enforcement actions brought under this section and appeals thereof shall
1408 conform to the applicable provisions of chapter 30A and informal hearing regulations
1409 promulgated thereunder.
1410 Section 61. The department shall publish at least annually, in such forms as the
1411 department may deem proper, information concerning the sales of commercial feeds, together
1412 with such data on their production, composition and use as the department may consider
1413 advisable, and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feeds sold
1414 within the commonwealth as compared with the analyses guaranteed in the registration and on
1415 the label; provided, that any information concerning production and use of commercial feed shall
1416 not disclose the operations of any person.
1417 SECTION 46. Chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
1418 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
66 of 96

1419 Section 125. The supreme judicial court or any justice thereof, and the superior court or
1420 any justice thereof, shall have jurisdiction in equity to enforce this chapter and regulations
1421 thereunder. Proceedings to enforce the same may be instituted and prosecuted by the attorney
1422 general.
1423 The remedies provided under this chapter shall be available in addition to, but not limited
1424 to, any other penalties provided by law or equity, in this chapter or elsewhere.
1425 The commissioner may promulgate regulations to implement this section. In addition to
1426 any authority provided in this chapter, the commissioner may issue orders necessary to enforce
1427 this chapter and to restrain violations thereof. Such orders shall be effective pending resolution
1428 of any appeal, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
1429 SECTION 47. Chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
1430 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 6 the following section:-
1431 Section 6A. (a) The director of the division of fisheries and wildlife shall consider land
1432 under the care and control of the division for potential designation and long-term passive
1433 management as a forest reserve and shall recommend designation of land as a forest reserve
1434 where such designation will: (i) contribute to carbon sequestration and storage as part of the
1435 commonwealth’s climate mitigation strategy; (ii) provide an opportunity for unique older forest
1436 habitats to mature and develop over time without intended intervention in ecological processes as
1437 part of a holistic, statewide, biodiversity conservation strategy; (iii) enhance climate resilience
1438 through the maintenance of connected natural landscape blocks and species movement corridors
1439 that provide a variety of important ecosystem processes, functions and services; (iv) provide
1440 unique opportunities for compatible passive outdoor recreation and other public enjoyment to
67 of 96

1441 serve a diverse public with wide-ranging recreational values; and (v) facilitate ecological
1442 research, comparative studies of forest dynamics, and long-term monitoring to evaluate reserves
1443 as compared to other land management approaches.
1444 (b) The director, with approval of a simple majority of the fisheries and wildlife board
1445 present at a duly called meeting of the board, may designate land under the care and control of
1446 the division as a forest reserve. Forest reserves shall be managed consistent with such
1447 designation unless the director, with the approval of not less than a two-thirds majority of the
1448 fisheries and wildlife board present at a duly called meeting of the board, and with the approval
1449 of the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, de-designates said land.
1450 (c) Designation or de-designation of land as a forest reserve shall constitute an
1451 administrative designation and shall not change the entity with care, custody and control of the
1452 land; constitute a change in the use of the land; otherwise dispose of land or an interest in land;
1453 or otherwise change the existing status of the land as a wildlife management area or other land
1454 management unit.
1455 (d) The department shall passively manage forest reserves to allow natural processes to
1456 determine changes in the structure and composition of the forest ecosystem to the greatest degree
1457 possible. Forest reserves shall not be managed for production of timber or forest products or
1458 intentionally manipulated, and active management shall be avoided, even when disturbances
1459 occur, to the extent feasible. After consultation with a forest reserve science and technical
1460 advisory committee to be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, the
1461 division may undertake active management or assisted restoration actions to (i) sustain
1462 ecosystem function, vital ecosystem services and habitat values; (ii) control problematic pests,
68 of 96

1463 pathogens and invasive species; (iii) restore water and wetland resources; (iv) protect public
1464 safety; or (iv) address other unforeseen circumstances. The division may undertake such other
1465 management actions as may be required by law.
1466 Compatible passive recreational activities, regulated hunting and trapping, conversion or
1467 removal of plantations, maintenance or repair of existing forest roads, trails and administrative
1468 access points, preservation of historic and cultural resources, removal of immediate threats to
1469 public safety, selective understory invasive plant control and monitoring and research activities
1470 shall be permitted within forest reserves.
1471 SECTION 48. Section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1472 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second, third, fourth and fifth sentences
1473 of the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following sentences:- Said notice shall be
1474 filed by delivery in hand to the conservation commission or its authorized representative or by
1475 certified mail, return receipt requested, to said commission, or, if none, to the board of selectmen
1476 in a town or the mayor of a city in which the proposed activity is to be located, or by electronic
1477 delivery to the conservation commission, or, if none, to the board of selectmen or mayor, as
1478 specified in regulations promulgated by the department of environmental protection. Upon such
1479 filing, the receipt of such notice shall be acknowledged in writing and shall include the time and
1480 date so received. A person delivering said notice by hand shall be given a receipt in writing
1481 acknowledging the time and date of such filing. Copies of such notice shall be sent concurrently
1482 by electronic delivery to the department of environmental protection.
69 of 96

1483 SECTION 49. Said section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further
1484 amended by striking out, on line 74, the figure “1,000” and inserting in place thereof the
1485 following figure:- 100.
1486 SECTION 50. Said section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further
1487 amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 2
1488 paragraphs:-
1489 Within 21 days of the receipt by a conservation commission of a written request made by
1490 any person by a method of delivery as specified in regulations, said commission shall make a
1491 written determination as to whether this section is applicable to any land or work thereon. When
1492 such person is other than the owner, notice of any such determination shall also be sent to the
1493 owner. As specified by the department in regulations, certain activities may be approved by
1494 determinations with conditions, and without the filing of a notice of intention if the conditions
1495 ensure that the activities will have negligible or minor wetlands impacts. Temporary impacts
1496 may also be approved with a determination with conditions, provided that the wetlands are fully
1497 restored as specified by the department in regulations. Violation of a condition of a
1498 determination of applicability shall be a violation of this section.
1499 The department may designate by regulation types of proposed work that have
1500 insignificant wetlands impacts and may be approved by the conservation agent or conservation
1501 commission chairman or by the department in writing and without a notice of intention or
1502 determination and without a public hearing. Such approval may include, but not be limited to,
1503 any conditions necessary to further the interests of this section. A copy of the approval shall be
70 of 96

1504 sent to the department at the same time it is sent to the applicant, and the department shall have 7
1505 days from receipt to revoke the approval.
1506 SECTION 51. Said section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further
1507 amended by striking out the seventeenth, eighteenth and nineteenth paragraphs and inserting in
1508 place thereof the following 3 paragraphs:-
1509 The conservation commission, selectmen or mayor receiving notice under this section
1510 shall hold a public hearing on the proposed activity within 21 days of the receipt of said notice.
1511 Notice of the time and place of said hearing shall be given by the hearing authority at the
1512 expense of the applicant, not less than 5 days prior to such hearing, or another period of time
1513 specified in department regulations, by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
1514 city or town where the activity is proposed, or by notice on the city or town website or other
1515 means, as specified in regulations promulgated by the department, and by mailing a notice to the
1516 applicant and to the board of health and the planning board of said city or town. The
1517 conservation commission and its agents, officers and employees and the commissioner of
1518 environmental protection and his agents and employees, may enter upon privately owned land
1519 for the purpose of performing their duties under this section. No conditions shall be imposed, nor
1520 shall any determination be rendered by a conservation commission, in reference to this section,
1521 unless the conservation commission meets with a quorum present. The department may provide
1522 by regulation that certain activities that require a notice of intention may not require a public
1523 hearing but shall require public notice.
1524 If, after said hearing or after deliberation of the conservation commission, selectmen or
1525 mayor, on the notice of intent where no hearing is required, the conservation commission,
71 of 96

1526 selectmen or mayor, as the case may be, determine that the area on which the proposed work is
1527 to be done is significant to public or private water supply, to the groundwater supply, to flood
1528 control, to storm damage prevention, to prevention of pollution, to protection of land containing
1529 shellfish, to the protection of wildlife habitat, to the protection of fisheries, to resilience for
1530 changing climate conditions, or to the protection of the riverfront area consistent with the
1531 following purposes: to protect the private or public water supply; to protect the ground water; to
1532 provide flood control; to prevent storm damage; to prevent pollution; to protect land containing
1533 shellfish; to protect wildlife habitat; to protect the fisheries, and to resilience for changing
1534 climate conditions, such conservation commission, board of selectmen or mayor shall by written
1535 order within 21 days of such hearing, or within 21 days from publication of the notice if no
1536 hearing is required, impose such conditions as will contribute to the protection of the interests
1537 described herein, and all work shall be done in accordance therewith. If the conservation
1538 commission, selectmen or mayor, as the case may be, make a determination that the proposed
1539 activity does not require the imposition of such conditions, the applicant shall be notified of such
1540 determination within 21 days after said hearing, or within 21 days from publication of the notice
1541 if no hearing is required. Such order or notification shall be signed by the mayor or a majority of
1542 the conservation commission or board of selectmen, as the case may be, and a copy thereof shall
1543 be sent forthwith to the applicant and to the department. The department may designate by
1544 regulation types of proposed work, including but not limited to certain nature-based solutions
1545 projects, ecological restoration, or wetlands resilience projects, or priority housing projects
1546 consistent with commonwealth land use planning and housing strategies and plans, climate
1547 resilient design guidelines and environmental priorities, that may be approved with a general
1548 order of conditions provided that the proposed project does not result in impacts to areas subject
72 of 96

1549 to jurisdiction that are greater than those specified by the department in regulations. For linear
1550 shaped projects where work is proposed in 3 or more adjacent municipalities the applicant shall
1551 submit a notice of intent, request for determination, or other request specified by the department
1552 in regulations directly to the department for review and decision. Prior to issuing a decision, the
1553 department shall provide the conservation commissions in these municipalities with an
1554 opportunity to comment on the notice or request.
1555 If a conservation commission has failed to hold a hearing within the 21 day period as
1556 required, or if a commission, after holding such a hearing has failed within 21 days therefrom to
1557 issue an order, or if no hearing is required and a commission has failed within the 21 day period
1558 to issue an order, or if a commission, upon a written request by any person to determine whether
1559 this section is applicable to any work, fails within 21 days to make said determination, or where
1560 an order does issue from said commission, the applicant, any person aggrieved by said
1561 commission's order or failure to act, or any owner of land abutting the land upon which the
1562 proposed work is to be done, or any 10 residents of the city or town in which said land is located,
1563 may, by certified mail or electronic filing, as specified in regulations, and within 10 days from
1564 said commission's order or failure to act, request the department of environmental protection to
1565 determine whether the area on which the proposed work is to be done is significant to public or
1566 private water supply, to the groundwater supply, to flood control, to storm damage prevention, to
1567 prevention of pollution, to protection of land containing shellfish, to the protection of wildlife
1568 habitat, to the protection of fisheries, to resilience for changing climate conditions, or to the
1569 protection of the riverfront area consistent with the following purposes: to protect the private or
1570 public water supply; to protect the ground water; to provide flood control; to prevent storm
1571 damage; to prevent pollution; to protect land containing shellfish; to protect wildlife habitat; to
73 of 96

1572 protect the fisheries, and to resilience for changing climate conditions. The commissioner of
1573 environmental protection or a designee also may request such a determination within said 10
1574 days. The party making any such request shall at the same time send a copy thereof by certified
1575 mail to the conservation commission, board of selectmen or mayor which conducted the hearing
1576 hereunder. If such party is other than the applicant, a copy of such request shall also be sent at
1577 the same time by certified mail to the applicant. Upon receipt of such request the department
1578 shall make the determination requested and shall by written order issued within seventy days of
1579 receipt of such request, and signed by the commissioner or their designee, impose such
1580 conditions as will contribute to the protection of the interests described herein; provided,
1581 however, that said department shall notify the applicant within 30 days of the receipt of such
1582 request if the application or request is not in proper form or is lacking information or
1583 documentation necessary to make the determination. Such order shall supersede the prior order
1584 of the conservation commission, board of selectmen or mayor, and all work shall be done in
1585 accordance therewith, but in no event shall any work commence until 10 days have elapsed
1586 following the issuance of said order. In the case of riverfront areas, no order issued by a
1587 conservation commission, board of selectmen, mayor, or the department shall permit any work
1588 unless the applicant, in addition to meeting the otherwise applicable requirements of this section,
1589 has proved by a preponderance of the evidence that: (i) such work, including proposed mitigation
1590 measures, has no significant adverse impact on the riverfront area for the following purposes: to
1591 protect the private or public water supply; to protect the ground water; to provide flood control;
1592 to prevent storm damage; to prevent pollution; to protect land containing shellfish; to protect
1593 wildlife habitat; to protect the fisheries, and to resilience for changing climate conditions, and (ii)
1594 there is no practicable and substantially equivalent economic alternative to the proposed project
74 of 96

1595 with less adverse effects on such purposes. An alternative is practicable and substantially
1596 economically equivalent if it is available and capable of being done after taking into
1597 consideration: costs, and whether such costs are reasonable or prohibitive to the owner; existing
1598 technology; the proposed use; and logistics in light of overall project purposes. For activities
1599 associated with access for 1 dwelling unit, the area under consideration for practicable
1600 alternatives will be limited to the lot; provided, that said lot shall be on file with the registry of
1601 deeds as of the August 1, 1996. For other activities including, but not limited to, the creation of a
1602 real estate subdivision, the area under consideration shall be the subdivided lots, any parcel out
1603 of which the lots were created, and any other parcels that are adjacent to such parcel or adjacent
1604 through other parcels formerly or presently owned by the same owner at any time on or after
1605 August 1, 1996 or any land which can reasonably be obtained; provided, that an ownership
1606 interest can reasonably be obtained after taking into consideration: cost, and whether such cost is
1607 reasonable or prohibitive to the owner; existing technology; the proposed use; and logistics in
1608 light of overall project purposes. At any time prior to a final order of determination by the
1609 department, any party requesting a determination may in writing withdraw the request, and such
1610 withdrawal shall be effective upon receipt by the department. Notwithstanding the withdrawal,
1611 the commissioner or their designee may continue the determination if they notify all parties
1612 within 10 days of receipt of the withdrawal. A copy of such order shall be sent to the applicant,
1613 to the conservation commission, board of selectmen or mayor which conducted the hearing
1614 hereunder. As used in this section, the term “wildlife habitat” shall mean those areas subject to
1615 this section which, due to their plant community composition and structure, hydrologic regime or
1616 other characteristics, provide important food, shelter, migratory or overwintering areas, or
1617 breeding areas for wildlife. The department may provide by regulation that specified provisions
75 of 96

1618 of this paragraph shall not apply to notices of intent or requests for determination for certain
1619 types of proposed work, including but not limited to certain nature-based solutions projects,
1620 ecological restoration, or wetlands resilience projects, or for work in the buffer zone as defined
1621 by the department by regulation, or for priority housing projects consistent with commonwealth
1622 land use planning and housing strategies and plans, climate resilient design guidelines and
1623 environmental priorities. The department may also provide by regulation that such notices of
1624 intent or requests for determination may not be the subject of a request for a superseding order of
1625 conditions or applicability or a request for an adjudicatory hearing in accordance with the
1626 provisions of chapter 30A; and that any person aggrieved by the issuance or failure to issue a
1627 decision on such notice of intent or request for determination may obtain judicial review by
1628 filing an application for review in the superior court within 21 days after receipt of an order of
1629 conditions or a determination from the conservation commission, or within 21 days of the
1630 conservation commission’s failure to act. Notwithstanding the provisions of the previous
1631 sentence, the department may, in its regulations regarding such notices of intent or requests for
1632 determination, provide that within 10 days of the conservation commission’s action or failure to
1633 act, the department may notify the applicant and the commission that it will be issuing a
1634 superseding order of conditions or determination, which it shall issue within 70 days of making
1635 such notification. Such superseding order or determination may be the subject of a request for
1636 adjudicatory hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 30A.
1637 SECTION 52. Section 34 of chapter 132 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1638 Official Edition, is hereby repealed.
1639 SECTION 53. Section 7 of chapter 132A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1640 Official Edition, is hereby repealed.
76 of 96

1641 SECTION 54. Section 7A of said chapter 132A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1642 striking out, in lines 1 to 2, the words “environmental management, division of forest and parks,”
1643 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- conservation and recreation.
1644 SECTION 55. Said section 7A of said chapter 132A, as so appearing, is hereby further
1645 amended by striking out the second, third, fourth and fifth paragraphs.
1646 SECTION 56. Said section 7A of said chapter 132A, as so appearing, is hereby further
1647 amended by adding the following paragraph:- The chief park ranger and park rangers appointed
1648 and employed by the department may assist the bureau of fire control in both suppression and
1649 detection of fires.
1650 SECTION 57. Section 93 of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1651 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the figure “15” and inserting in
1652 place thereof the following figure:- 17.
1653 SECTION 58. Said section 93, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking
1654 out, on line 10, the word “12” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- 14.
1655 SECTION 59. Said section 93, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking
1656 out, on line 21, the words “advanced building technology,” and inserting in place thereof the
1657 following words:- climate risk, 1 of whom shall be an expert in climate resilient design, 1 of
1658 whom shall be an expert in the development of housing.
1659 SECTION 60. Section 95 of said chapter 143, as so appearing, as amended by sections 43
1660 and 44 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by adding the following
1661 subsection:-
77 of 96

1662 (d) Ensure building regulations and requirements address climate impacts for the
1663 purposes of reducing exposure and damages to structures and protecting the health, safety and
1664 security of the occupants or users of buildings.
1665 SECTION 61. Chapter 183 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
1666 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
1667 Section 70. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “residential real property” shall,
1668 unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean real property improved by a 1 to 4 family
1669 dwelling used or occupied, or intended to be used or occupied, wholly or partly, as the home or
1670 residence of 1 or more persons, condominium units or cooperative apartments; provided,
1671 however that any such real property shall not include unimproved real property upon which such
1672 dwellings are to be constructed.
1673 (b) The secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the secretary
1674 of housing and livable communities, shall issue standard notification forms and such other
1675 materials as necessary to inform prospective purchasers and tenants about the flood risks of
1676 residential real property. Such forms and materials may include, but are not limited to: (i)
1677 information on whether the residential real property is located in a floodplain; (ii) documentation
1678 of historical flooding and past damages on the property, such as claims filed and grants or
1679 disaster assistance received for flood damage or flood mitigation; and (iii) details about any flood
1680 insurance or elevation certificates for the property.
1681 (c) A person selling residential real property shall, prior to the signing of a purchase and
1682 sale agreement, provide to the prospective purchaser a completed copy of the applicable
1683 notification form and other materials prepared pursuant to subsection (b). Any person leasing
78 of 96

1684 residential real property with an option to purchase such property shall, prior to the signing of the
1685 lease with an option to purchase, provide to the lessee-prospective purchaser a completed copy
1686 of the applicable notification form and other materials prepared pursuant to subsection (b).
1687 (d) All persons leasing or renting residential real property shall, prior to entering into an
1688 agreement to lease or rent such property, notify prospective tenants about the hazards of flood
1689 risk as provided herein.
1690 A residential lease shall contain the following notice to tenants: “Flood insurance is
1691 generally available to renters through the Federal Emergency Management Agency's (FEMA's)
1692 National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) to cover your personal property and contents in the
1693 event of a flood. A standard renter's insurance policy does not typically cover flood damage. You
1694 are encouraged to examine your policy to determine whether you are covered.”
1695 Prior to entering into a tenancy agreement, the owner of residential real property or such
1696 other person to whom rent is to be regularly paid, shall provide a prospective tenant with: (i) a
1697 completed copy of the applicable form and materials prepared pursuant to subsection (b); and (ii)
1698 2 copies of a statement certifying that the prospective tenant received all of the above materials,
1699 a copy of which is to be retained by both the tenant and the owner, provided that such
1700 certification may be included as a provision in a written tenancy agreement.
1701 (e) An owner who fails to comply with the provisions of this section, including but not
1702 limited to providing knowingly false or incomplete disclosures, shall be liable for damages
1703 caused by the failure to comply. A violation of this section by a person engaged in trade or
1704 commerce shall be an unfair and deceptive act or practice as defined in section 2 of chapter 93A.
79 of 96

1705 SECTION 62. Section 32 of chapter 184 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
1706 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 23 to 24, 33 to 34, and 80, the words
1707 “metropolitan district commission”, each time they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in each
1708 instance, the following words:- department of conservation and recreation.
1709 SECTION 63. Said section 32 of said chapter 184, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1710 adding the following paragraph:-
1711 The secretary of environmental affairs, commissioner of the department of conservation
1712 and recreation, commissioner of food and agriculture and the secretary of housing and livable
1713 communities may, at such times as they are not available to certify approval, authorize in writing
1714 a designee to approve restrictions on their behalf, and a restriction approved and certified by such
1715 designee shall have the benefit of this section.
1716 SECTION 64. Section 7 of chapter 330 of the acts of 1983 is hereby repealed.
1717 SECTION 65. Section 177 of chapter 25 of the acts of 2009 is hereby amended by
1718 inserting at the end of the first paragraph the following words:- , Charles River Dam Road in the
1719 cities of Boston and Cambridge, a segment of Route 16 and Revere Beach Parkway, including
1720 Wellington Circle, from its intersection with Interstate 93/Route 38 in the city of Medford to its
1721 intersection with Route 145 (Winthrop Avenue)/Route 1A in the city of Revere, the Fellsway
1722 from Wellington Circle to its intersection with Interstate 93 in the cities of Medford and
1723 Somerville, Mystic Avenue in the city of Somerville, Medford Veteran’s Memorial Highway in
1724 the cities of Medford and Somerville and the Lynnway in the city of Lynn.
1725 SECTION 66. Section 44 of chapter 85 of the acts of 1994, as most recently amended by
1726 section 69 of chapter 209 of the acts of 2018, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
80 of 96

1727 words “Hyde Park section of the city of Boston” the following words:- , Herter Center at 1175
1728 Soldier’s Field Road in Herter Park within the Charles River Reservation in the city of Boston,
1729 transfer station at 1674-1680 Blue Hill Avenue in the Neponset River State Reservation in the
1730 city of Boston, Morton-Spaulding House at Mill Street in Moore State Park in the town of
1731 Paxton, the gatehouse on Highland Street in Bradley Palmer State Park in the town of Hamilton,
1732 Farnham Log Cabin at 437 North Road in Great Brook Farm State Park in the town of Carlisle,
1733 North Farm House at 107 Old North Road in Great Brook Farm State Park in Carlisle, Sugar
1734 House Krug Sugarbush at 236 South Street in the town of Chesterfield, the historic farmhouse
1735 and outbuildings located within the Manuel F. Correllus State Forest on Fire Road 56, off of
1736 Sanderson Avenue, in Edgartown.
1737 SECTION 67. There shall be a special commission on commonwealth port development
1738 to recommend an integrated statewide strategic vision for Massachusetts ports, including the
1739 designated port areas of: Gloucester Inner Harbor, Salem Harbor, Lynn, Mystic River, Chelsea
1740 Creek, East Boston, South Boston, Weymouth Fore River, New Bedford-Fairhaven and Mount
1741 Hope Bay. The commission shall identify industry-specific opportunities and needs, assess
1742 existing infrastructure with capacity and resources and develop recommendations to achieve
1743 stated priorities and goals.
1744 The commission shall prepare a report proposing an integrated statewide vision for the
1745 commonwealth’s ports and recommendations to implement that vision. The report shall include
1746 an assessment for relevant industry sectors, which shall include but not be limited to: (i)
1747 commercial and recreational fishing; (ii) energy; (iii) shipping, bulk cargo and goods; (iv)
1748 transportation and tourism; and (v) ocean technology and emerging markets. For each industry
1749 sector, the report shall assess: (i) existing conditions; (ii) industry needs; and (iii) opportunities
81 of 96

1750 for growth, taking into account infrastructure, costs, limiting geographic constraints and
1751 workforce development needs. The commission shall also consider, for each industry sector, the
1752 existing conditions and potential for development in each designated port area to achieve the
1753 vision for growth.
1754 The commission shall consist of 21 members: the secretary of economic development or
1755 their designee and the secretary of energy and environmental affairs or their designee, who shall
1756 serve as co-chairs; the chief executive officer of the Massachusetts Port Authority or their
1757 designee; and 18 members who shall be appointed by the governor, 10 of whom shall be
1758 representatives of the 10 designated port areas, provided that no more than 1 representative shall
1759 be from the same city or town, 5 of whom shall be representatives of each water-dependent
1760 industry sector; and 3 of whom shall be representatives of community groups representing the
1761 north shore, Boston harbor and south coast regions.
1762 The commission shall consult with the division of marine fisheries; the office of coastal
1763 zone management; the department of environmental protection; the Massachusetts clean energy
1764 center; the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority; the Massachusetts development finance
1765 agency; the seaport economic council; the commercial fisheries commission; any municipality
1766 that is host to a designated port area but does not otherwise have a representative on the
1767 commission; and other entities representing stakeholder perspectives as determined by the
1768 commission.
1769 Not later than 18 months of the effective date of this act, the commission shall file its
1770 report with the clerks of the house and senate, the chairs of the joint committee on economic
1771 development and the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means.
82 of 96

1772 SECTION 68. There shall be a special commission on flood risk mitigation and resilience
1773 in the Connecticut River Valley. The commission shall consist of the following members: the
1774 secretary of energy and environmental affairs or their designee, who shall be chair; the director
1775 of the Massachusetts emergency management agency or their designee; the executive director of
1776 the Franklin Regional Council of Governments or their designee; the executive director of the
1777 Pioneer Valley Planning Commission or their designee; 1 member who shall be appointed by the
1778 Senate President who shall be a member of the Senate from a district within the Connecticut
1779 River watershed; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of
1780 Representatives, who shall be a member of the House from a district within the Connecticut
1781 River watershed; and 15 members appointed by the Governor, 6 of whom shall be
1782 representatives of municipalities within the Connecticut River watershed, 2 of whom shall be
1783 representatives of regional water and sewer utilities, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a
1784 watershed organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the agriculture sector, 1 of whom
1785 shall be a representative from an environmental justice organization, 1 of whom shall be a
1786 representative from a land trust, 1 of whom shall be a representative from a labor organization
1787 and 2 of whom shall be representatives of regional higher education institutions.
1788 The commission shall prepare a plan that identifies and prioritizes regional resilience
1789 projects that reduce flood risk in the Connecticut River Valley through 2050. Said plan shall
1790 include but not be limited to: (i) a summary of applicable municipal vulnerability preparedness
1791 plans; (ii) identification of structural and non-structural regional resilience projects that would
1792 reduce flood risk to critical infrastructure, vulnerable populations, the economy and natural
1793 resources; (iii) an implementation plan including project costs, timelines and responsible entities;
83 of 96

1794 (iv) recommendations for local planning and policy actions to align with regional and state goals;
1795 and (v) a strategy for engaging disadvantaged and priority populations.
1796 The commission shall consult with the department of conservation and recreation, the
1797 department of agricultural resources, the department of environmental protection and the
1798 department of transportation.
1799 Not later than 18 months from the effective date of this act, the commission shall file its
1800 plan with the clerks of the house and senate, the chairs of the joint committee on environment
1801 and natural resources and the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means.
1802 SECTION 69. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
1803 General Laws, section 35 of chapter 92 of the General Laws or any other general or special law
1804 to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may, in
1805 consultation with the commissioner of conservation and recreation, transfer Ravine road between
1806 Fellsway East to the town line of the town of Stoneham to the town of Stoneham; provided, that
1807 the exact boundaries of the parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of
1808 capital asset management and maintenance.
1809 (b) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws,
1810 section 35 of chapter 92 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary,
1811 the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may, in consultation with the
1812 commissioner of conservation and recreation, transfer Ravine road between West Wyoming
1813 avenue to the town line of the town of Melrose to the town of Melrose; provided, that the exact
1814 boundaries of the parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset
1815 management and maintenance.
84 of 96

1816 (c) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws,
1817 section 35 of chapter 92 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary,
1818 the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may, in consultation with the
1819 commissioner of conservation and recreation, transfer Everett street in the Allston-Brighton
1820 section of the city of Boston to the city of Boston; provided, that the exact boundaries of the
1821 parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and
1822 maintenance.
1823 (d) The consideration for the conveyances authorized by this section shall be nominal.
1824 (e) The grantee of any real property disposed of pursuant to this section shall be
1825 responsible for all costs relating to the conveyance, including, but not limited to, appraisals,
1826 surveys, plans, recordings and any other expenses, as shall be deemed necessary by the
1827 commissioner.
1828 SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
1829 June 30 in fiscal years 2027 and 2028, the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority shall
1830 annually make a payment of $50,000 to each of the following towns located within the watershed
1831 of the Quabbin Reservoir: Belchertown, Hardwick, Ludlow, New Salem, Orange, Pelham,
1832 Petersham, Phillipston, Shutesbury, Ware and Wendell to support the role of these communities
1833 in hosting the Quabbin Reservoir.
1834 SECTION 71. Notwithstanding section 30 of chapter 29 of the General Laws or section
1835 65 of chapter 30 of the General Laws, a portion of the funds authorized in this act may be used
1836 for the costs associated with the purchase of title insurance and services for title examinations,
1837 reports and certifications; provided, however, that any executive department or state agency
85 of 96

1838 expending such funds shall maximize efforts and utilize all available means to minimize use of
1839 capital funds for such purpose.
1840
1841 SECTION 72. Each agency acquiring land or an interest in land under this act may
1842 expend an amount not to exceed 5 per cent of the amount appropriated to that agency for the
1843 purpose of reimbursing nonprofit land conservation organizations or land trusts for reasonable
1844 expenses directly associated with the acquisition of land or interests in land subsequently
1845 conveyed to the commonwealth. Reimbursements shall be made at the discretion of the agency.
1846 The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall determine by regulation what shall
1847 constitute reasonable expenses. If the commonwealth does not take title to the property through
1848 no fault of the nonprofit organization or the commonwealth, the commonwealth may reimburse
1849 the nonprofit organization for reasonable expenses associated with due diligence. An
1850 organization receiving a reimbursement under this section shall convey the land or interest in
1851 land to the agency for an amount not to exceed the actual purchase price paid by the organization
1852 for the land or interest in land in addition to any reimbursement received under this section.
1853 SECTION 73. For the purposes of section 12, section 31 and section 51, the secretary of
1854 energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the secretary of housing and livable
1855 communities and the commissioner of environmental protection, shall issue such guidelines and
1856 identify housing types that are considered priority housing within 6 months of the effective date
1857 of this act.
1858 For the purposes of section 62E of chapter 30 of the General Laws, section 18E of
1859 chapter 91 of the General Laws and section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, nature based
86 of 96

1860 solutions projects shall include, but not be limited to, projects whose primary purpose is to
1861 restore, enhance, or create wetland resource areas while increasing resilience or improving
1862 ecological function using natural methods and materials. The secretary of energy and
1863 environmental affairs, in consultation with the commissioner of environmental protection, the
1864 commissioner of fish and game and the director of coastal zone management shall, issue
1865 guidelines for identification of nature-based solutions projects within 6 months of the effective
1866 date of this act.
1867 SECTION 74. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
1868 secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the commissioner of
1869 environmental protection and the commissioner of fish and game, shall establish standards and
1870 guidelines for the resilient design of culverts, including culverts associated with bridges, in order
1871 to expedite the permitting of new municipal or replacement of existing municipal culverts. Such
1872 standards and guidelines shall consider projected future levels of and impacts from precipitation,
1873 stormwater or flood events and impacts to fisheries and wildlife and their habitats and shall
1874 integrate the Massachusetts stream crossing standards and any other relevant standards, including
1875 then-current tidal crossing standards or resilience design standards. The standards and guidelines
1876 shall be based on scientific information including, but not limited to, projected precipitation,
1877 hydrology and fisheries and wildlife and their habitats. The secretary shall establish such
1878 standards and guidelines within 6 months of the effective date of this act and shall review them 5
1879 years thereafter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the
1880 department of environmental protection to establish standards and guidelines for stream
1881 crossings, provided that such standards shall not conflict with the standards established by the
1882 secretary pursuant to this section.
87 of 96

1883 (b) No project shall be eligible for a general permit, general license, or inclusion in a
1884 special category pursuant to paragraphs (d) to (f), inclusive, unless it meets each of the following
1885 criteria:
1886 (i) The project involves a municipal project to repair, reconstruct or replace an existing
1887 municipal culvert or culverts, including culverts associated with bridges with spans of less than
1888 20 feet;
1889 (ii) The project complies with the standards and guidelines issued pursuant to subsection
1890 (a) to the maximum extent practicable;
1891 (iii) Except as needed to comply with clause (ii), the project provides substantially the
1892 same principal transportation capacity and is in a similar alignment to the structure to be
1893 repaired, reconstructed or replaced, including as to the immediate approaches necessary to
1894 connect a structure to an existing adjacent road, and the project does not include components of a
1895 reconstruction project other than the crossing and immediate approaches that are otherwise
1896 subject to permitting or licensing; provided that the addition of sidewalks, bike lanes or
1897 shoulders that are collectively less than a single lane in width shall not be deemed to
1898 substantially change the principal transportation capacity of an existing structure;
1899 (iv) If a project is located or will take place in priority habitat designated by the natural
1900 heritage and endangered species program of the division of fisheries and wildlife, the proponent
1901 has provided to that program for review all materials required by the program; and the program
1902 has completed its review and has determined that the proponent has demonstrated that the project
1903 will not result in take with or without conditions; and
88 of 96

1904 (v) The project complies with any other conditions established by regulation issued
1905 pursuant to this section.
1906 (c) The secretary and commissioner of environmental protection shall issue any
1907 regulations or take other actions necessary or appropriate to implement the use of the standards
1908 and guidelines established under subsection (a) to expedite implementation of projects meeting
1909 the criteria described in subsection (b) which require a certificate, permit, license, or other
1910 approval pursuant to: (i) section 61 and sections 62A to 62L, inclusive, of chapter 30 of the
1911 General Laws, (ii) chapter 91 of the General Laws, (iii) section 40 of chapter 131 of the General
1912 Laws and (iv) section 401 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Public Law 92-500, 33
1913 U.S.C., sections 1251 et seq., as amended. Such regulations shall require that for projects
1914 meeting the criteria described in of subsection (b), the department of environmental protection
1915 shall issue, deny or waive individual certifications pursuant to section 401 of the Federal Water
1916 Pollution Control Act within 60 days of a complete application.
1917 (d) (i) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of
1918 environmental protection, for projects meeting the criteria described in subsection (b) and for the
1919 purposes of ensuring more expeditious processing of approvals for such projects, shall issue
1920 regulations that create a general permit for the authorization of such projects, or a subset thereof,
1921 under section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws. The permittee shall comply with all general
1922 permit performance standards established by such regulations and any additional conditions
1923 specified by the approving authority that are necessary to protect the resource areas because of
1924 unique circumstances that are not addressed by the general permit performance standards. Local
1925 wetlands bylaws and ordinances shall not apply to the projects authorized under the general
1926 permit.
89 of 96

1927 (ii) The procedures described in section 40 of said chapter 131 shall apply to general
1928 permits issued pursuant to this paragraph, except as provided herein:
1929 (A) Written notice of intention under the general permit shall be submitted to the
1930 conservation commission or its authorized representative and the department of environmental
1931 protection by electronic delivery in a manner prescribed by the department. A person submitting
1932 a notice of intention shall publish notification of the proposed project in a print newspaper of
1933 local or general circulation, or a newspaper’s website, including on-line only newspaper
1934 publications, or a statewide or city- or town-wide website that may be maintained as a repository
1935 for such notices at the time of submittal of the notice of intention. Said notification shall describe
1936 the project location, details of the project, resource area impacts and any other relevant
1937 information needed to adequately describe the proposed project and shall specify that comments
1938 be sent within 14 days of publication to the conservation commission and the appropriate
1939 regional office of the department of environmental protection based on the location where the
1940 activities are proposed. No public hearing is required.
1941
1942 (B) If, after reviewing the notice of intention, the conservation commission determines
1943 the project meets the criteria described in subsection (b), including any standards developed by
1944 the department of environmental protection, then the conservation commission shall issue an
1945 order of conditions containing any conditions pursuant to regulations established under clause (i)
1946 of subsection (d) within 42 days of a complete notice of intention under this general permit.
1947 Notices of intention not meeting the criteria of this paragraph shall be denied.
90 of 96

1948 (iii) In the event that a conservation commission fails to issue an order of conditions or
1949 denial within the required time period, the project proponent may, within 10 days after such
1950 failure to act, request a superseding order of conditions from the department of environmental
1951 protection. The department of environmental protection shall make a decision and issue a written
1952 order or denial within 42 days from receipt of a complete application.
1953
1954 (iv) The provisions of paragraph 20 of section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws
1955 shall not apply to the general permit except that within 10 days of receipt by the department of
1956 environmental protection of an order of conditions issued pursuant to this general permit, the
1957 department may appeal such order of conditions pursuant to said paragraph 20 of said section 40
1958 of said chapter 131.
1959 (e)(i) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of
1960 environmental protection, for projects meeting the criteria described in subsection (b) and for the
1961 purposes of ensuring more expeditious processing of approvals for such projects, shall issue
1962 regulations to create a general license for the authorization of such projects, or a subset thereof,
1963 which are otherwise subject to individual licensing under sections 12, 12A, 13, 14, 18 and 19 of
1964 chapter 91 of the General Laws. Licensees shall comply with any general license performance
1965 standards established by such regulations and any additional conditions specified by the
1966 department. A proponent of a project eligible for a general license under this section shall certify
1967 compliance with its terms and conditions to the department on such timelines as the department
1968 requires and shall pay all applicable fees required by the department. The department shall
1969 review such certification and, if consistent with the general license, confirm compliance in
91 of 96

1970 writing within 60 days of receipt of a complete application. No construction subject to said
1971 chapter 91 shall commence prior to issuance of such certification by the department. The
1972 regulations shall protect and preserve any rights held by the commonwealth in trust for the public
1973 to use tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for lawful purposes and public rights of access
1974 on private tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for any lawful use. The provisions of
1975 subsection (f), subsection (g) and subsection (h) of section 18D of the General Laws shall apply
1976 to general licenses issued pursuant to this paragraph.
1977 (f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary may by
1978 regulation provide that projects meeting the criteria described in subsection (b), or a subset of
1979 such projects, are a special category of project which shall not require an environmental impact
1980 report under section 62B of chapter 30 of the General Laws regardless of location.
1981 (g) The department of environmental protection shall consolidate adjudicatory
1982 proceedings regarding the same proposed project that are requested for permits, licenses or
1983 certifications under subsections (d), (e) or (f) unless consolidation would not contribute to
1984 expeditious resolution of the appeals.
1985 (h) The department of environmental protection and executive office of energy and
1986 environmental affairs shall propose regulations not later than 6 months after the effective date of
1987 this act. The department and executive office shall provide support and guidance to cities and
1988 towns to assist them in applying concurrently for and otherwise streamlining the review and
1989 approval of projects eligible for general permits, general licenses or other approvals pursuant to
1990 this section.
92 of 96

1991 (i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the application of section 24 of
1992 chapter 79 of the Acts of 2014.
1993 SECTION 75. Section 74 is hereby repealed.
1994 SECTION 76. Paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of section 168 of chapter 175 of the
1995 General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the
1996 following clause:- ; provided, however, that annually on December 1, at the discretion of the
1997 secretary of administration and finance, the comptroller shall transfer to the Resilience
1998 Revolving Fund pursuant to section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29 an amount up to the difference
1999 between the amount of such fees collected in the prior fiscal year and the amount of such fees
2000 collected in fiscal year 2027.
2001 SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
2002 unexpended and unencumbered balances of the bond-funded authorizations in the following
2003 accounts shall cease to be available for expenditure 180 days after the effective date of this act:
2004 2500-7024, 2850-9951, 2840-8963, 2850-6967, 2820-1420, 2840-7993, 2800-2012, 2800-2013,
2005 2800-2014, 2800-2019, 2820-2011, 2820-2012, 2840-2013, 2840-2014, 2840-2018, 2840-2019,
2006 2840-2023, 2890-2023, 2890-2040, 2800-7013, 2800-7018, 2800-7016, 2800-7011, 2800-7012,
2007 2800-7015, 2800-7017, 2800-7019, 2800-7022, 2800-7097, 2800-7098, 2840-7014, 2840-7017,
2008 2890-7010, 2890-7011, 2810-7872, 2810-8802, 2800-7035, 2800-7031, 2800-7108, 2840-7026,
2009 2840-7027, 6720-1336, 2840-7024, 2890-7035, 2800-7020, 9300-3909, 9300-7909, 9300-7010,
2010 2000-6966, 2000-6967, 2000-6969, 2000-2010, 2000-2011, 2000-2012, 2000-2014, 2000-2015,
2011 2000-2016, 2000-2018, 2000-2019, 2000-2020, 2000-2021, 2000-2022, 2000-2023, 2000-2024,
2012 2000-2025, 2000-2026, 2000-2017, 2000-2035, 2000-2028, 2000-2029, 2000-7013, 2000-7014,
93 of 96

2013 2000-7015, 2000-7016, 2000-7018, 2000-7023, 2000-7024, 2000-7025, 2000-7052, 2000-7054,
2014 2000-7057, 2000-7056, 2000-7051, 2000-7029, 2000-7053, 2000-7070, 2000-7028, 2000-7031,
2015 2000-7055, 2000-7059, 2000-7062, 2000-7063, 2000-7135, 2000-7081, 2240-8820, 2250-8820,
2016 2250-8822, 2200-7991, 2200-2011, 2200-2012, 2200-2013, 2200-2014, 2200-2015, 2200-2016,
2017 2200-2017, 2200-2018, 2200-2019, 2200-7011, 2200-7013, 2200-7017, 2200-7018, 2200-7020,
2018 2200-7025, 2300-2010, 2300-2011, 2300-2012, 2300-2014, 2300-2016, 2300-2017, 2300-7018
2019 2300-7010, 2300-7011, 2300-7015, 2300-7016, 2300-7020, 2300-7021, 2300-7025
2020 SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the
2021 expenditures necessary in carrying out sections 2 to 2D, inclusive, the state treasurer shall, upon
2022 receipt of a request by the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to
2023 be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate,
2024 $2,511,145,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth, as aforesaid, shall be designated on
2025 their face “An Act to Build Resilience for Massachusetts Communities” and shall be issued for a
2026 maximum term of years, not exceeding 20 years, as the governor may recommend to the general
2027 court pursuant to section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided,
2028 however, that all such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2052. All interest and
2029 payments on account of principal on such obligations shall be payable from the General Fund.
2030 Bonds and interest thereon issued under the authority of this section shall, notwithstanding any
2031 other provision of this act, be general obligations of the commonwealth.
2032 SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the
2033 expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2E, the state treasurer shall, upon receipt of a
2034 request by the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to be specified
94 of 96

2035 by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, $385,000,000. All bonds
2036 issued by the commonwealth, as aforesaid, shall be designated on their face “An Act to Build
2037 Resilience for Massachusetts Communities” and shall be issued for a maximum term of years,
2038 not exceeding 20 years, as the governor may recommend to the general court pursuant to section
2039 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided, however, that all such bonds
2040 shall be payable not later than June 30, 2052. All interest and payments on account of principal
2041 on such obligations shall be payable from the General Fund. Bonds and interest thereon issued
2042 under the authority of this section shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, be
2043 general obligations of the commonwealth.
2044 SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the
2045 expenditures necessary in carrying out sections 2F to 2G, inclusive, the state treasurer shall, upon
2046 receipt of a request by the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to
2047 be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate,
2048 $100,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth, as aforesaid, shall be designated on their
2049 face “An Act to Build Resilience for Massachusetts Communities” and shall be issued for a
2050 maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general
2051 court pursuant to section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided,
2052 however, that all such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2062. All interest and
2053 payments on account of principal on such obligations shall be payable from the General Fund.
2054 Bonds and interest thereon issued under the authority of this section shall, notwithstanding any
2055 other provision of this act, be general obligations of the commonwealth.
2056 SECTION 81. Sections 7, 13 through 20, 34 through 36, 40, 45, 52 through 56 and 61
2057 shall take effect 90 days from the effective date of this act.
95 of 96

2058 SECTION 82. Sections 11 and 76 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2059 SECTION 83. Section 75 shall take effect 10 years from the effective date of this act.
96 of 96